  This is version 2.1 text for the Torg Discworld adaptation, slightly 
revised from its 4 part posting on 12 May 1996.

DISCWORLD

Date: Sun, 12 May 1996 21:15:54 -0500
From: Saxon.Brenton@uts.edu.au (Saxon Brenton)
To: Multiple recipients of list <torg@buddha.intecom.com>
Subject: [TORG:1519] Discworld 1 of 4
X-Listprocessor-Version: 6.0c -- ListProcessor by Anastasios Kotsikonas
X-Comment: The Torg Mailing List

On Fri, 3 May 1996 Jim Ogle (Ks. Jim) <jogle@aoc.nrao.edu> wrote in 
'[TORG:1093] Our recent flurry of activity' on the Torg mailing list:
[...]
> So for those who have been swamped by the messages, the trend indicates
> that things should slow down for the next couple of days, time for you
> to get caught up (or just purge your mailboxes. 8-)

  Infected by Dr Mobius's pulp villain virus, Saxon sits planning Evil deeds:
  "The last time I posted an attempt at a comprehensive adaptation was 
Xanth. The initial post was a approached 40 kb, but the commentaries it 
spawned ran for many times that. If I post the long-promised Discworld 
article now, then a similar reaction will cause the population of the 
mailing list - burdened by the Recent Flurry Of Activity - to flee 
screaming. And then Pinky, I will be able to Take Over The World! 
BWAHAHAHAHAHAHA!"
  <cue peals of thunder and organ music>
  :-)

  Hmm, looks like it may be time for another one of my multipost reality 
writeups that approach 20,000 words :-)
  Okay, okay. Here is the second draft of the Discworld write-up that's 
been sitting on my discs, twiddling its thumbs for the past 2-1/2 years. 
The first one back in 1994 was a brief description, and - for those who 
were on a.g.t and remember it - had Too Many World Laws (ie, it violated 
the dave oaks Four Law Limit :-).
  When I started writing this, the excellent and mind-bogglingly useful 
_Discworld Companion_ had not yet been released in Australia, and this 
tends to show in the writing style, I think. I now have over 280 pages of 
A4 notes, and have sprinkled in page numbers for more obscure references 
to support my rulings on how the game mechanics should work. Most of the 
page numbers refer to my Corgi affordableback editions (the exceptions 
are _Eric_ and the _Discworld Companion_, both Gollancz).
  Note that the Pratchett's worldview is not necessarily conductive to 
the Torg structure of reality, specifically with regard to the axiom 
level divisions. In an interview he responded to the observation that the 
city of Ankh-Morpork primarily resembles a Renaissance Italian city state 
thusly, "There's no reason why worlds should all develop in the same way. 
The Greeks had all the necessary theoretical knowledge and technical 
ability to invent the wind-up gramophone. The steam-powered gramophone, 
come to that. They just never did" (DC, p. 283).
  For roughly similar reasons, the cosmology of the Discworld has had 
to be altered to fit into a Torg adaptation. In Pratchett's view "The DW 
'universe' -- turtle, world, sun, moon -- moves slowly through our own 
universe." While this may be fine for the 'real' Discworld, it is 
slightly problematic shoehorning it into the Torg arrangement of the 
cosmverse. Of course, it is technically possible for the Discworld to 
exist as a realm within the Core Earth universe, but it is ultimately 
easier to simply rule that the Torg adaptation exists within its own 
dimension, a cosm in its own right with its own pocket dimensional fringe 
realities.
  Commentaries welcomed. This is, after all, only the second draft, and 
just think how much fun we all had with the dissection of the Torg Xanth 
write-up :-)

Index
Post 1   PROLOGUE
Post 2   THE COSM
         - THE CREATOR'S USE OF MAGIC
         - AXIOMS AND WORLD LAWS
Post 3   MORE ON THE COSM
         - MAGIC
         - FOLK RACES
         - GODS
         - SKILLS
Post 4   FRINGE REALITIES
         - BIBLIOGRAPHY

-----
Saxon Brenton     City library of the Uni of Technology, Sydney, Australia
saxon.brenton@uts.edu.au          |          saxonb@mpx.com.au
The Librarian "liked people who loved and respected books, and the best 
way to do that, in the Librarian's opinion, was to leave them on the 
shelves where Nature intended them to be." - Terry Pratchett, _Men At Arms_



Date: Sun, 12 May 1996 21:28:55 -0500
From: Saxon.Brenton@uts.edu.au (Saxon Brenton)
To: Multiple recipients of list <torg@buddha.intecom.com>
Subject: [TORG:1521] Discworld 2 of 4
X-Listprocessor-Version: 6.0c -- ListProcessor by Anastasios Kotsikonas
X-Comment: The Torg Mailing List

Post 2
TORG DISCWORLD ADAPTATION

THE COSM
  This cosm is adapted from the 'Discworld' series of humorous fantasy 
novels by Terry Pratchett. The Discworld is a flat world that rests atop 
four elephants (Berila, Tubul, Great T'Phon, and Jerakeen), who in turn 
stand on the shell of the ten thousand mile long world turtle, the Great 
A'Tuin. Said Terry at various times on alt.fan.pratchett, "The elephants 
face outwards. The spinning of the Disc does not harm the elephants 
because that's how the universe is arranged."; "The *shell* of the turtle 
is slightly smaller than the world, but the flippers and head and tail 
are all visible from the Rim, looking down -- as Rincewind does in 
_The Colour of Magic_."
  The Discworld is a platter roughly 30,000 miles in circumferences, and 
some 30 miles thick. At the edge of the world the seas falling off into 
space create the Rimfall (although it is unclear where all this water 
comes from), and at the Hub there is a ten mile high spire of green ice 
and grey rock called Cori Celesti, at the summit of which is Dunmanifestin, 
the abode of the gods. The Hub regions have a cold polar climate, while 
the rim regions tend to be warm and tropical. The world as a whole gives 
the impression that it was designed to be looked at from above.
  "There are, of course, two major directions on the Disc: Hubwise and 
Rimwards. But since the Disc itself revolves at a rate of once every 
eight hundred days (in order to distribute the weight fairly upon its 
supportive pachyderms, according to Reforgule of Krull) there are also 
two lesser directions, which are Turnwise and Widdershins.
  "Since the Disc's tiny orbiting sunlet maintains a fixed orbit while 
the majestic Disc turns slowly beneath it, it will be rapidly deduced 
that a Disc year consists not of four but eight seasons. The summers are 
those times when the sun rises or sets at the nearest point on the Rim, 
the winters those occasions when it rises or sets at a point ninety 
degrees along the circumference.
  "Thus, in the lands around the Circle Sea, the year begins on Hogs' 
Watch Night, progressing through a Spring Prime to its first midsummer 
(Small Gods' Eve) which is followed by Autumn Prime and, straddling the 
half-year point of Crueltide, Winter Secondus (also known as Spindlewinter, 
since at this time the sun rises in the direction of spin). Then comes 
Secondus Spring with Summer Two on its heels, the three-quarter mark of 
the year being the night of Alls Fallow - the one night of the year, 
according to legend, when witches and warlocks stay in bed. Then drifting 
leaves and frosty nights drag on towards Backspindlewinter and a new Hog's 
Watch Night nestling like a frozen jewel at it's heart.
  "Since the Hub is never closely warmed by the weak sun the lands there 
are locked in permafrost. The Rim, on the other hand, is a region of sunny 
islands and balmy days." (TCoM, p. 11-12)
  Although the above is true, the _Companion_ (p. 48-9) points out the 
difference between the full _astronomical_ year (called the spin year, or, 
in the days of the Ankh-Morpork Empire, the Great Year) of 800 days, and 
the _agricultural_ year (technically a half year). Whatever the wizards and 
astronomers say, most folk, and certainly rural folk, measure their year 
by the plough-plant-grow-reap cycle. There are thirteen months in the year 
- Offle, February, March, April, May, June, Grune, August, Spune, 
Sektober, Ember, December and Ick.
  The sun is a ball of fire about a mile across. Because of its fixed 
orbit, the elephants are occasionally obliged to cock up a leg to let it 
pass. The moon has to shine by its own light (TLF, p. 115).
  As Great A'Tuin swims though space, the stars are seen to move relative 
to the world turtle's direction. As a result, although here are always 64 
(8 x 8) signs to the Disc zodiac, new ones are constantly being 
discovered and named, and then left behind never to be seen again 
(necessitating that the tile mosaic floor of the Unseen University 
Observatory be relaid every decade or so).
  Geographically, the Disc is a vast and varied place, with a variety of 
countries and cultures in which to explore. This is because Pratchett's 
style of writing is a type of comic fantasy that includes lots of in-
jokes, references and homages to Real Life situations that he calls 
'resonances'. This is effect is covered under the Law of Resonances, below. 
In practice, the Disc includes societies that strongly resemble settings 
of other literature (eg, Wyrumberg = Pern), and of Real Life. Looking at 
the _Discworld Map_, it can be seen that there are four continents. By far 
the biggest is the unnamed one where most of the stories have been set. 
It contains the cities of Ankh-Morpork, Lancre (generic European kingdom 
combined with rural United States), Llamedos (Wales), Uberwald 
(Transylvania), Genua (New Orleans), and the Nordic-like areas around 
No Thingfjord.
  Rimwards and turnwise of this huge continental mass is a smaller 
section, Klatch, which is also called a continent in much the same way 
that Europe is given a continent status separate from Asia. Klatch 
contains vaguely Mediterranean countries towards the Hub, such as Tsort 
(Rome), Ephebe (Greece). Djelibeybi (Egypt) and Om (church dominated 
Mediaeval Europe) around the Circle Sea, and then shades down into more 
African locales like Howondaland. It also contains the Tezumen Empire 
(Aztecs).
  Connecting with the main landmass by a peninsula the near-permanent (?) 
ice cap at the Hub) is the Counterweight Continent dominated by the 
Agatean Empire. The Counterweight Continent balances the weight of the 
other lands because, despite it smaller size, it contains rich deposits 
of the heavy metal octiron, and to a less important extent, gold. The 
Agatean Empire is often called the Aurient ("Where the gold comes from") 
and resembles China/Asia. Running off turnwise from the Agatean Empire 
area number of islands drawn with volcanoes; I don't remember reading 
anything about them, but I guess they represent Japan analogues. The 
fourth and smallest continent is the Lost Continent of XXXX (Australia). 
There are two islands (Land of Fog) widdershins off XXXX which from a 
comment in the _Map_ probably represent New Zealand.
  There are various other islands, such as Ku, which because it has sunk 
is probably meant to be Mu/Atlantis, and the Brown Islands, which because 
they have surfing are probably meant to be at least partly Hawaii.
  There are also reported to be a large number of brigadoons (places that 
are present in one place only at certain times, and which will eventually 
vanish until their next appearance) on the Discworld (DC, p. 53).

A ROUGH HISTORY OF THE DISCWORLD WITH REGARDS TO THE DISPOSITION OF THE 
CREATOR AND THE FALL OF MAGIC
  The Creator of the Discworld is actually A Creator; one of apparently 
many who contract out to create universes. The Discworld's Creator has 
more imagination than mechanical aptitude (TCoM, p. 75), and this is borne 
out by disparaging comments he made about putting your trust in physical 
laws alone to keep a universe running:
  "Some people... think its enough to install a few basic physical formulas 
and then take the money and run. A billion years later you got leaks all 
over the sky, black holes the size of your head... I think people appreciate 
the _personal_ touch, don't you?" (E, p. 93). 
  As a result the Discworld was created with a VERY high Magic axiom, to 
hold the world together more or less as cosmic glue (WS, p. 6). It was 
also lacking in solid physical laws that would have made it 
comprehensible: "The Creator had a lot of remarkably good ideas when he 
put the world together, but making it understandable hadn't been one of 
them" (M, p. 12). (This rather slapdash approach to world creation means 
that the Discworld has a rather unique problem in terms of the stability 
of its reality; see Magical (In)Stability, under 'More On Magic', below.)
  Exactly how high the Magic axiom was in those days probably can't be 
accurately quantified, but the fact that mortals soon began using it to 
war against the gods implies that it was somewhere around or above Magic 
30: "In those days magic in its raw state had been widely available, and 
had been eager utilised by the First Men in their war against the Gods." 
(TCoM, p. 119).
  Thus, the Mage Wars raged until the beings known as the Old High Ones 
stepped in: "And great and pyrotechnic were the battles that followed - 
the sun wheeled across the sky, the seas boiled, weird storms ravaged the 
land, small white pigeons appeared mysteriously in people's clothing, and 
the very stability of the Disc (carried as it was through space on the 
backs of four giant turtle-riding elephants) was threatened. This 
resulted in stern action by the Old High Ones, to whom even the Gods are 
answerable. The Gods were banished to the high places [Dunmanifestin], 
men were re-created a good deal smaller, and much of the old wild magic 
was sucked out of the earth" (TCoM, pp. 119-120), the latter having the 
effect of lowering the Magic axiom. For the purposes of this work I am 
assuming that the Olden Ones are the same as the Old High Ones, and thus 
can attribute to them the imposition of the Law of Conservation of 
Reality as well: "magic had indeed once been wild and lawless, but had 
been tamed back in the mists of time by the Olden Ones, who had bound it 
to obey among other things the Law of Conservation of Reality; this 
demanded that the effort needed to achieve a goal should be the same 
regardless of the means used." (TCoM, p. 79).
  Internal evidence also suggests that the Old High Ones may have also at 
this time imposed on the Discworld various physical laws that were in 
evidence at later times throughout the novels of the series. Things like 
the laws of conservation of energy that limit wizard spells; or what the 
noble Disc dragons consider "all boring physical laws" and which they 
choose to defy in order to fly (GG, p. 170).
  It can be presumed that although the Law of Conservation of Reality 
came into immediate effect for spell casting, it took longer for its full 
effects to begin to restrict magical creatures. This would explain why 
the noble Disc dragons didn't vanish into the dimension(s) of imagination 
all at once; but instead went away for longer and longer stretches of 
time until one day they didn't come back at all, and today must be 
summoned back by a willing imagination harnessing a powerful magical 
field (TCoM, p. 151). It would also explain why the nasty wild elves were 
able to stay until they were driven away to the dimension called 
Fairyland, taking with them many of the remaining magical creatures, such 
as unicorns.
  Or to put it another way, the Disc's Magic axiom was lowered by the 
Old High Ones because of the Mage Wars. Men and gods were the first to be 
affected, but there was also an eventual knock-on effect that led to 
other magical creatures suffering as well. Typical, really.
  Today, the remaining creatures that were once magical are no longer so, 
and live dirty, rather squalid lives (Squires the gnome in TLF) because 
of the Law of Conservation of reality's ban on the use of magical 
enhancement packages. Those creatures that do have potent magics tend to 
have an at least partly extradimensional existence (The Dryads in TCoM).

AXIOMS AND WORLD LAWS
Magic 19     Social 20     Spirit 22     Tech 17

Magic 19
  The Discworld has a very high Magic axiom due to the immense 
magical field generated to hold the place together, although it was much 
higher up until the end of the Mage Wars and the imposition of the Law 
of Conservation of Reality.
  The Law of Conservation of Reality complicates the Magic axiom of the 
Discworld, so that although this cosm has lots of magical power, it is 
not as easily used as this axiom level would normally indicate (i.e., 
unlike in most realities, there is not always a direct correlation 
between the level of magical power in the cosm, and the sophistication 
that the power can be put to by the living as a tool).
  The actual amount of magical energy on the Disc is consistent with a 
Magical axiom of 19, which is an enforced drop from 30ish.
  The axiom of 19 is indicative of the _types_ of effects available to 
magic-users. Wizards have used extradimensional spells for summoning up 
demons (Mag 15) and there is a predisposition for wizards to use 
Impressed spells (Mag 17) because such spells are easier to cast. The 
LoConsOfR caps the Magic axiom at this level in order to forbid the types 
of effects that an axiom above 19 would bring. This includes Wish spells 
(Mag 20) and most especially the 'easy magic' that begins to occur from 
axiom 22 onwards, where magical processes begin to become easier and 
magic-users actually get _bonuses_ to their castings. The latter runs 
against the very purpose of the LoConsOfR, and so is strictly verboten by 
that world law.
  However, the presence of the LoConsOfReality means that in many ways 
the practical Magical axiom is 9. Various creatures that need small 
amounts of magic can survive at this level. It was for this reason that 
the noble dragons departed this world for one of the dimensions of 
imagination; they could exist (barely) at an effective Mag axiom of 9, 
but not as well as they were accustomed to, and so threw a collective 
wobbly and left. The presence of a non-corporeal entity like Mr Ixolite 
the banshee (needing Mag 10) thwarts my attempts to explain, other than 
the fact that he is described several times as the last of the banshees, 
and thus may be either a holdover from time of higher Magic levels, or a 
fluke (probably supported by the Law of Chaotic Whimsy (aren't fudge 
factors wunnerful? :-)).
  Note that because of the Law of Belief, anthropomorphic 
personifications of the Disc (Death, the Sandman, the Hogfather, Old Man 
Trouble, Soul Cake Thursday Duck, et al) operate under the Spirit axiom 
rather than the Magic axiom and so do not require Mag 10.
  More importantly, Magic 9 is the level at which _difficulty level_ of 
spells is determined. The LoConsOfR dictates that the effort needed for 
any activity must be the same regardless of whether magical or non-magical 
means are used. Thus, while all four magical skills operate efficiently, 
and spell types of up to axiom level 19 can be used without contradiction, 
the difficulty of using magic is as if at an axiom level of Magic 9 and 
thus has a +3 modifier to both the Difficulty and Backlash. Additionally, 
further increases in the Difficulty and Backlash of a spell are possible 
depending on whether a spell is Impressed into memory for later use or 
not. Impressed spells add a +0 modifier to spell Difficulty and Backlash, 
while those that are not impressed add a further +3 to Difficulty and 
Backlash.
  The increased difficulty of magic reflects onto the number of 
practitioners of magic as well. While it is true that the societies of 
wizards and witches generally have policies that keep the number of magic-
users low (in order to avoid problems with the Things using a plethora of 
undertrained and improperly supervised mages as catspaws), the number of 
mages who turn up naturally is more in line with Magic 9 than Magic 19 
(Mag 18 - "Most beings in the cosm use some magic to at least a limited 
degree"). Magic on the Disc is usable only by a small proportion of the 
population, who usually need years to learn how to use it properly.
  APPORTATION effects are difficult because various principles of mass/
energy conservation and leverage apply to them. For example, when using a 
transmigration spell to move instantly from point A to point B, a 
comparable mass must be shunted back from point B to point A to maintain 
balance (LaL, p. 223). Similarly, when using telekinesis, the brain is 
under a lot of strain which, if not properly braced against, can cause 
great physical damage. Thus, when casting Apporatation spells, someone 
who takes a fatal amount of backlash dies because their brains have been 
catapulted out their ears (TLF, p. 188).
  ALTERATON effects are difficult because the shape of everything is 
dictated by its morphogenic field, which in turn is controlled by the 
mind. Basically, the shape of the body is determined by deep-seated, 
subconcious mental habits. To change someone's shape you have to change 
how he thinks about himself at the most primal level. This is only 
moderately difficult for creatures which actually have minds; but for 
things that don't the magician has to go down to molecular level to 
change the molecules' minds (WA, pp. 203, 208-9). This latter effect is 
possible, it suffers an additional +2 to the Difficulty and Backlash.
  CONJURATION effects are difficult because it takes a lot of magical 
power to create the energy that makes up the item that is conjured (MP, 
pp. 146, 293).
  And DIVINATION? Nothing's actually been mentioned in the novels that 
would specifically explain the greater difficulty for this skill. In 
fact, the description of how wizards and witches sense their impending 
deaths suggests that Divination effects are easier. The description of 
the process in the Torg Rulebook and the Nippon Tech SB of the way 
ambient magical power allows for intuitive flashes, deja vu, and 
precognitive foresight meshes very well with the way the same process 
works on the Discworld. On the Disc, memory stretches out both behind 
and ahead of the individual, but most people on the Discworld ignore this; 
wizards and witches, however, know enough about magical process not to 
ignore these insights.
  It has been suggested by Kansas Jim that perhaps Divination has been 
exempted from the increased difficulty of magic generally under the Law 
Of Conservation Of Reality, and that the ability of wizards and witches 
to sense their impending deaths is a type of punitive tradeoff. When the 
Old High Ones started to impose the LoConsOfReality some smart-ass 
wizard tried to convince them that Divination magic wasn't dangerous 
enough and shouldn't be shackled by the world law. The Old High Ones 
decided to teach this guy a lesson, so they let him (and all other magic 
users) keep his divinatory abilities, but with the price that he could 
not avoid knowing the approach of his own demise while also being 
acutely aware that there was nothing he could do about it. These days, 
of course, some magic users have become more or less reconciled to their 
impending death, and use the foreknowledge to put their affairs in order 
and go out having a good time. Others, such as Greyhold Spold in TLF, 
spare no effort to try to avoid Death, but always fail anyway.
  This reasoning sounds good to me. In game terms Divination spells are 
exempted from all of the above penalties.

Social 20
  The important thing to remember about the Discworld is that the people 
who live on it do not act like typical fantasy genre inhabitants. When 
interviewed Pratchett has commented that part of the humour of the series 
comes from having an irrational fantasy setting, but populated by people 
who try to act rationally; people do not go into bars and cry "Ho 
inkeeper! A flagon of your best mead!" unless they are seriously ODing on 
the Dried Frog Pills. Thus, the heroic and villainous causes that 
motivate the populations of Aysle and Avalon seem very alien to most 
Discworlders. As Granny Weatherwax has noted, you can't go about acting 
as if stories and folk songs were real. Although there are some incurable 
romantics who try.
  Superficially, most Discworlders tend to act very much like Core 
Earthers; mostly they go about their lives as best they can. People are 
just people - even the undead ones (RM) and golemim (FoC). Discworlders 
do, however, have a tendency to be dreadfully literal-minded: "If the 
Creator said 'Let there be light'...  he'd have got no further because 
of all the people saying 'What colour?'" (MaA, p. 52)
  The biggest difference between the living and the undead is that dying 
tends to strip one of all the foolish preconceptions that living in a 
society foists upon one. Death has been described as being like waking 
up. As a result, although undead people reside among the living pretty 
much as they had before (albeit with some discrimination) their natural 
tendency not to ignore the strange and unusual still makes them outsiders 
somewhat.
  Politically the most sophisticated place on the Discworld is probably 
the city of Ankh-Morpork. In order to keep the city of one million people 
from metaphorically flying apart the Patrician, Lord Vetinari, has 
devised a subtle and extremely effective means of keeping the various 
guilds and power groups in a state of disarray by playing them off 
against each other (Social 20: "Pluralism, the balancing of many actions 
within a government and society"). In this way none of them ever gain 
enough power or influence to upset the mechanics of the cities' 
functioning. His methods include a top rate spy service, and truly 
organised crime (with the Thieves Guild having agreed to a set amount of 
crime for a financial year, most citizens prefer to plan ahead, make a 
payment, have an acceptable level of crime committed at their convenience 
in the privacy of their own home, then keep the receipt), and finally a 
Doug Piranha-like use of Sarcasm. The Patrician has also written a private 
monograph, 'The Servant', on the effective weilding of political power.

Spiritual 22
  There are definite divine agencies on the Discworld, and they make sure 
that people know it. The gods are a stroppy lot, and take a dim view of 
atheists. Whenever the philosophers in Ephebe start pondering whether the 
gods exist, the gods are usually only too happy to present 
incontrovertible proof by smiting them with lightning.
  It should be noted, however, that gods don't mind the fiery atheists, 
who bitterly hate the idea of gods and put as much effort into not 
believing in them as most worshippers do into their faith. That type of 
hate is almost as good as worship (SG, p. 248).
  But, while the gods are there, they don't pay much attention to their 
worshippers when it comes to miracles. They tend to be rather self-
absorbed, and usually play games with the fate of their worshippers 
(especially their chosen heroes: "The soul of a true Hero always finds a 
better rate of exchange, and is highly valued by the gods" - TCoM, p. 86) 
more than they do tending their flocks. See the Law of Divine Self-
Absorption for the fringe reality of Dunmanifestin. Miracles tend to be 
less common than they would be in, say, Aysle, but when they do turn up 
the types available are extremely varied and can be quite potent.
  Since gods exist because their worshippers believe they exist, and new 
ones are developing from small gods all the time, the Spirit axiom is 
less than 23 (the point at which one mythos would become dominant, and 
as a result lock things in place rather than allow the current 
flexibility). At Spi 17 locations are capable of perpetual miracles even 
without the presence of a community, but such things tend to get lost 
among the various weirdnesses on the Disc, such as the rains of fish at 
Pine Dressers which are so regular that this landlocked town has its 
own canning industry. At Spi 21 the laity may create miracles without 
need for the Focus skill, but again, the Disc gods are so stand-offish 
that that is no guarantee that a call for a miracle will be responded to.

Technological 17
  In Torg terms the level of technology described in the novels varies 
between 15 and 16, with a few instances indicating that an axiom shift 
of Tech 17 has spread outward from Anhk-Morpork since the early books 
in the series. The Discworld has had fireworks for some time, and the 
Agatean Empire makes use of cannons. Meanwhile, in _Men at Arms_ the 
invention of the gun (or gonne, as it was called) by the eccentric Ankh-
Morpork genius Leonard of Quirm was briefly rediscovered. The gonne, 
however, was suppressed on agreement by the Patrician, the Assassins 
Guild, and the Ankh-Morpork City Guard. The Patrician didn't want 
something powerful enough to upset the social stability of the city; the 
Assassins prefer to "inhume" people up close and personal as a matter of 
professional pride, and so are prejudiced against all long-distance 
weapons; and the Guards just didn't want any more people getting killed. 
Consequently, non-Discworld characters who attract too much attention with 
their firearms around Ankh-Morpork are likely to be quietly and 
efficiently removed.
  The Ephebians worked out ages ago the existence of atoms and that the 
speed of light is finite (subsonic, actually); and the usefulness of 
nitrogen-fixing plants for agriculture is understood (LaL, p. 24).
  Printing is possible, but around the Circle Sea a ban imposed by Unseen 
University means that printing is restricted to having the block of the 
page carved as a whole rather than being composed of many individual, 
reusable pieces. This is because the wizards fear that if type blocks 
were used to print up a book of magic, then strange things might happen 
if they were reused for mundane volumes: the metal might _remember_. This 
prevents the founding of any daily broadsheet newspapers, but magazines 
do exist. Moveable type is used on the Counterweight Continent.
  Clockwork exists to power watches and clocks, but in practice it is not 
always of good quality. Frequently, watches instead function because of 
small conjured imps who power them by pedalling. Unfortunately, these 
watches stop when the imps disappear after a few months. Iconographs 
(cameras) also use conjured imps to paint instant pictures; and before 
movies were banned as being too dangerous to the fabric of reality, movie 
cameras also used imps. However, powerful and efficient clockworks are 
possible. Witness the Barbarian Invaders machine invented by Leonard of 
Quirm (SM). Similarly, the computer called Hex in the High Energy Magic 
Building at Unseen University runs primarily by clockwork (probably being 
somewhat analogous to Babbage's Analytical Engine and Differential 
Engines), although Hex also has a magical factor which supports its AI 
functions.
  Indications that the Disc has pushed into early Tech 17 is that the 
alchemists have recently started producing and selling matches (which 
had made it as far as Lancre by ER), and that physicians have recently 
gotten ahold of the newfangled idea of diseases being caused by bacteria 
and viruses ("He's caught a walrus, there's a lot of it going around!" - 
P, p. 62) On the other hand, the general consensus is still that thought 
originate in the heart, and that the brain is just an organ for keeping 
the blood cool.
  Note that depending on how events turn out, the Disc could also well be 
on the verge of both an agricultural and industrial revolution. In 
_Reaper Man_ the blacksmith Ned Simmel created a functional horse-drawn 
and powered combine harvester, and in _Small Gods_ the Ephebian 
apprentice philosopher Gurn used a primitive steam engine to power both a 
boat and a tank. Future developments could cause a sharp rise in the Tech 
axiom.
  One special note should made about the presence of octocelulose film 
in _Moving Pictures_. The axiom tables list Tech 20 as needed for movies, 
including 'talkies', but this is the level needed to produce and develop 
photosensitive films. By comparison the film industry created by the 
alchemists at Holy Wood actually operated at a Tech level of only 16 
("plant extracts and essences possible"), because the octocelulose film 
used was simply transparent rather than photosensitive. The transfixing 
of the images onto the film was carried out by conjured imps (two imps 
painting _really fast_ as the cameraman wound the film past the lens, 
with another four imps blowing the paint dry). Then, for projecting the 
images onto the movie screen, the projectionist would wind the film in 
front of a light source.

Law of Chaotic Whimsy
  This world law stipulates that rules can be broken by the GM if it 
makes for a good joke. The Law of Chaotic Whimsy may seem superficially 
to be like the Law of Humour in the Cartoon Cosm, but the Law of Chaotic 
Whimsy is a world law that cannot be used as a tool by players. On the 
Discworld, some of the effects created by this law include: 
  - The fact that no matter how powerful an explosion that kills somebody, 
the shoes will always remain, with the classic wisp of smoke curling out 
of them.
  - The way that an explosion or collision are always followed, a few 
seconds later, by one last tinkle of falling metal or glass.
  - The fact that any pantry raided at night will always contain 
leftovers, no matter what's in there by day.
  - Exactly 1 in a million chances automatically succeed, although not 
other improbable odds, such as 1 in 999,999.
  The LoChaotic Whimsy also supports other weirdnesses, such a Opposites. 
For example, darkness is not the opposite of light, it is merely light's 
absence; the opposite of light is the light fantastic. A practical example 
of a magical opposite can be heard every day in Ankh-Morpork in the form 
of anti-noise, which is the opposite of sound while silence is merely 
sounds absence. Anti-noise actively soaks up and cancels out sound. As 
the various clocks and bell towers sound the hour, for a few minutes it's 
almost impossible to tell one from another amongst the din until Old Tom 
in the Unseen University bell tower begins to toll. Although tongueless, 
Old Tom is made of the magic metal octiron, and rings out peals anti-
noise that leaves brief bursts of silence. If you want you can also 
experience an Opposite by getting knurd. This is the opposite of getting 
drunk, and although not a particularly pleasant experience, can be done 
simply by drinking Klatchian coffee. [In the books the existence of 
Opposites is attributed to a high magic axiom, but is here delegated to a 
world law because we haven't seen its like in other high magic realities 
like Aysle.]
  The Law of Chaotic Whimsy is an active law, and can pester Discworld 
characters no matter where they hide. Just because the characters can't 
use it as a tool doesn't mean it cant get them.

Law of Resonances
  The Discworld is a "world and mirror of worlds". Large parts of the 
humour of the series derive from the references to non-Discworld events 
and literature, in the various forms of allusions, references, tributes, 
parodies, satires, puns, quotations and deliberate misquotations.
  The first effect of this has no specific game mechanic: when the GM is 
designing and running a Discworld adventure, it is to be expected that 
lots of little in-jokes should be included as plot elements, background, 
scenery, and dangerous distractions for players <evil grin>. (Although 
GMs often do this in normal gameplay anyway; if so, ignore this bit.)
  The second effect is that a lot of the Discworld reality set is made up 
of bits and pieces and ideas from other realities. As a result, the 
Discworld (like Core Earth) tends to be a natural zone of dominant reality 
rather than the more usual pure zones. This explains why it was so 
comparatively easy for the cinematic reality of Holy Wood to try to merge 
with the Discworld in _Moving Pictures_, and why the invading wild elves 
from Fairyland weren't hampered more by disconnection in _Lords and 
Ladies_. But, whereas Core Earth's reality is dominant because it has an 
unprecedented amount of Possibility energy, which allows its inhabitants 
to conceive of multiple alien realities as entertainment, the Discworld's 
reality is dominant because it tends to let in alien ideas, absorb them 
into itself, and then transforms them to make them its own. It's 
flexibility is thus world law derived rather than P-energy level derived, 
and is imposed from without rather than an option of developing from 
within.
  Although Discworlders can relatively easily adopt to new cultural 
patterns, they nevertheless still tend to retain their extreme literal-
mindedness.
  The Law of Resonances is a passive law.

Law of Conservation of Reality
  At the dawn of the world there was much magic loose on the Disc, which 
was easily used by almost any sapient being. As a result the Mage Wars 
flared between the humans and gods until the beings known variously as the 
Olden Ones and the Old High Ones stepped in to put a stop to it. Among 
other things, most of the original wild magic was sucked out of the Disc 
(lowering the Magic axiom as a result), and the Law of Conservation of 
Reality was imposed (CoM, pp. 79, 119-20).
  In order to explain the way magic works in the novels in terms of the 
Torg system this necessarily complicated world law is used. Most of it is 
already explained under the Magic axiom. To summarise, this world law 
stipulates that the effort needed to do something will be the same whether 
magical or non-magical means are used. As a result, while the full benefit 
of the Magic axiom (19) is available only for the _types_ of effects at 
that level, the WL makes the actual _use_ more difficult, both for 
individual mages and society as a whole, as if at Magic 9. This means a 
+3 modifier is applied to the Difficulty and Backlash of spells. There is 
a further bias towards the use of Impressed spells, which have a +0 
modifier, over non-Impressed spells, which have a +3 modifier.
  The LoConsOfR bans the use of enhancement packages (cf the elves and 
giants of Aysle, or the tharkoldu) under the otherwise powerful 
Magic axiom. Wee folk like pixies, brownies, etc, tend to lead grubby 
lives as a result (TCoM), but do not have to worry about the Silent Death.
  One important factor in the Law of Conservation of Reality is that it 
becomes inoperative at Magic axioms of 25 or greater. Why else would the 
Olden Ones have siphoned off the excess magic if simply implementing this 
world law would have been enough? This is why magic became so easy to use 
when the sourcerer Coin was around; a sourcerer is a source through which 
new magical power can enter the world. Coin's presence blasted the local 
Magic axiom up past the level that the Law of Conservation of Reality 
could cope with, so that instead of suffering penalties to their spell 
casting, the wizards gained the bonuses that flow naturally from such a 
high axiom level. This situation lapsed when Coin departed into a pocket 
dimensional fringe reality of his own creation (see Maligree's Wonderful 
Gardens, below). However, it may be possible that those magically 
irradiated areas left over from the Mage Wars might still contain 
similarly high Magic axioms. By this time most (some 95%) would have 
decayed to less than 24, but if a magician could find some rare area of 
axiom 25 or greater (usually no more than 100 meters across) then he 
could be _very_ powerful within his little demse. (Providing he or she 
was prepared to put up with the inherent risks of Magical(In)Stability 
that such an area would possess.)
  The Law of Conservation of Reality is an active law, and can pester 
Discworld characters no matter where they hide.

Law of Belief
  The Law of Belief primarily acts as an adjunct to the Spirit axiom, and 
essentially acts like an accelerated version of the normal Torg processes 
of reality being defined and changed over time by the aggregate belief of 
the population. It functions most effectively for belief affecting gods 
and anthropomorphic personifications (like Death). (Note that under this 
world law anthropomorphic personifications operate under the Spirit 
axiom rather than the more usual Magic axiom 10 for "embodiments of 
moral virtues" It has even been demonstrated that old gods can slip into 
the job of anthropomorphic personifications, as the Hog Father has done, 
so presumably there wasn't that much difference between them anyway.) 
These beings are given power, form and personality by the belief of 
mortals.
  It is also possible for the Law of Belief to be used to effect changes 
to the material world, although the evidence on this is complicated and 
often contradictory. For instance, in _Moving Pictures_ the Things from 
the Dungeon Dimensions used the Cthinema of Holy Wood to gain access to 
the world; while people were watching and believing what they saw on the 
silver screen so much that it weakened the already thin walls of reality, 
the Things clothed themselves in the images of the actors which had taken 
on form and substance because of the effects of this world law. There was 
also the failed attempt by the wizard Cutwell to maintain in existence a 
version of history where Princess Keli of Sto Lat remained alive by 
convincing the population of Sto Lat that this was so.
  It is also strongly tempting to attribute at least part of the temporary 
success of the invasion of Lancre by the elves to this effect of the 
Law of Belief, since that would explain how the elves were able to 
superimpose some of their world onto part of Lancre. If so, it would 
be consistent with the elves' modus operandi, since the wall between 
worlds at the stone circle known as the Dancers was sundered by the 
Queen of the Elves by manipulating people's belief and desire to call 
herself and her minions to the Discworld. The alternative is that the 
elves possessed some particularly potent reality manipulating magics, 
which in the Torg sense there was no evidence of.
  On the other hand, the novels have informed us on occasion that people 
generally don't acknowledge what is really there because their personal 
beliefs, common sense, and social upbringing get in the way. Witches and 
wizards are trained to see things as they really are rather than what they 
are thought to be. People ignore the presence of Death up until the time 
of their actual demise, because their minds shy away from him. Most 
people don't consciously hear Gaspode the Wonder Dog when he talks to 
them, because people know that dogs don't talk (although they do hear him 
on a subconscious level, and so he can beg food from them by use of 
subliminal requests).
  Rather than risk recreating Avalon's Law of Legends and letting PC 
Storm Knights manipulate reality on anything other than a personal level, 
I will just throw in the supposition that the above attempts by Cutwell, 
the Things, and the elves were attempts to use the Law of Belief when 
combined with the Law of Chaotic Whimsy and possibly even the Law of 
Resonances. Thus, they were exceptions rather than the rule and not 
necessarily earmarked for success.
  So. For the most part attempts to change the world with this world law 
are erratic and unsuccessful as Belief is better at shaping gods than 
shaping the world: belief "may not be able to move mountains, exactly. 
But it can create someone who can." (RM, p. 103). Thus, the LoBelief is 
essentially super fast fertiliser for growing gods.
  The effects of the Law of Belief are 'temporary'. Effects created by it 
evolve rapidly, but can vanish just as quickly. If people stop believing, 
the effect created by their belief ceases to exist. This is quite 
different to the more normal Torg process of the way a cosm's reality 
develops: it may take ages for a change to propagate, but once it's 
entrenched it usually requires a further, active change in beliefs to 
alter it.
  Thus, gods on the Disc require that their faithful continually and 
actively worship them. A god that no longer gains power from the belief 
of worshippers dwindles back into a small god (essentially, a barely 
sentient mote of energy that hungers for worship) (SG; M, p. 151; WA, p. 
237). This is also the case with many of the anthropomorphic 
personifications who derive from social customs (eg, the Hog Father, the 
Sandman, Old Man Trouble). An entity personifying a more profound and 
universal concept, like Death, will always be believed in, even if 
subconsciously, and is less likely to discorporate through lack of belief 
as long as any form of life exists.
  This world law also affects the nature of the afterlife a person gets. 
The gods rarely bother to judge the dead, so instead you get what you 
believe in. The afterlife is a very subjective, and often unfair, 
phenomenon.
  The Law of Belief is a passive law, except for determining afterlives.

Reconnection Numbers
Character from the Discworld  	Character in the Discworld
is in reality of:      		is from reality of:
Atlantis   	 5		Atlantis   	13
Avalon   	 3		Avalon   	12
Aysle   		 3		Aysle       	11
Aztec Empire 	 3		Aztec Empire 	 9
Core Earth   	 9		Core Earth   	15
Cyberpapacy 	11		Cyberpapacy  	12
Kantovia   	 3		Kantovia   	17
Land Below * 	 3		Land Below * 	16
Lereholm   	 3		Lereholm   	17
Living Land   	 5		Living Land   	21
Magna Verita 	 3		Magna Verita  	13
Nile Empire   	 7		Nile Empire   	10
Nippon Tech 	10		Nippon Tech 	18
Olympus   	 3		Olympus   	14
Orrorsh   	 5		Orrorsh   	 8
Pulse's cosm   	16		Pulse's cosm 	23
Star Sphere   	15		Star Sphere   	14
Terra       	 8		Terra       	15
Tharkold   	11		Tharkold   	10
Tz'Ravok   	 3		Tz'Ravok   	16
* also Arachnidia and Gehenna

-----
Saxon Brenton     City library of the Uni of Technology, Sydney, Australia
saxon.brenton@uts.edu.au          |          saxonb@mpx.com.au
The Librarian "liked people who loved and respected books, and the best 
way to do that, in the Librarian's opinion, was to leave them on the 
shelves where Nature intended them to be." - Terry Pratchett, _Men At Arms_



Date: Sun, 12 May 1996 21:42:06 -0500
From: Saxon.Brenton@uts.edu.au (Saxon Brenton)
To: Multiple recipients of list <torg@buddha.intecom.com>
Subject: [TORG:1523] Discworld 3 of 4
X-Listprocessor-Version: 6.0c -- ListProcessor by Anastasios Kotsikonas
X-Comment: The Torg Mailing List

Post 3
MORE ON THE COSM

MORE ON MAGIC
The Number Between 7 And 9
  On the Discworld eight is the number of the most potent magical 
significance, and is even important in non-magical concerns: there are 
eight days in the week, eight hundred days in the year, eight seasons, 
and eight colours in the spectrum (though the eighth, octarine, is a 
magical pigment usually not seen by most people).
  There are eight great spells within the Octavo, the Creator's grimoire, 
which were used to create the world; and 64 (8 x 8) signs of the zodiac. 
Wizards usually work with octograms when casting spells that need shapes 
of occult significance, although there have been mentioned instances 
where other shapes have been used - magic circles for summoning demons 
(E, pp. 16-17) and protective lead pentagrams in the room used for housing 
the Octavo at Unseen University (TCoM, p. 88). There are therefore 
presumably other numbers and shapes of mystic significance (such as 
pentagrams and thaumatic triangles), but they are of secondary importance 
behind octograms.
  In game terms this effect can be applied when constructing spells or 
rituals that need a specific number or shape. When constructing such 
magics, as part of the spell creation process, the use of eight and 
octograms should be encouraged by adding a bonus of +1 to the final total 
of a roll. The use of other numbers and shapes is penalised by applying a 
-1 modifier to the final total of the roll. Naturally, such modifications 
to spell processes cause the spells in question to be contradictions 
when cast in any reality other than that of the Discworld or its fringe 
realities.
  However, although eight is the most potent magical number, wizards (and 
presumably witches) will not risk saying it aloud in an unprotected area - 
since it is also the number of Bel-Shamharoth the Soul Render. 
Bel-Shamharoth is one of the Things from the Dungeon Dimensions, and 
seems to have gained some purchase on the Discworld by being worshipped 
as an ichor god (TCoM, p. 89; P, p. 14). Magic-users who say "eight" risk 
attracting Its attention, and being dragged off to a place that is both 
underground and Somewhere Else, and then having their soul eaten to the 
accompaniment of loud slurpy noises and satisfied sucker-smacking sounds. 
It is usually safe for wizards to say "eight" in the magically protected 
environs of Unseen University (DC, p. 89), but they habitually refer to 
this forbidden number as 7a anyway.

Magical (In)Stability
  A direct result of the Creator's lack of mechanical aptitude but 
abundance of imagination is that the Discworld doesn't work particularly 
well, and is in fact held together by magic as a sort of cosmic glue 
(WS, p. 6). It does this by having reality distorted by the presence of 
so much magical power that otherwise impossible effects (such as the 
floating the mountain of Wyrmberg) are possible. Note, however, that 
while this large amount of magical power, if properly applied, can hold 
the world together, if improperly applied it can easily tear the world 
apart, which is why it is so dangerous to run the risk of creating an 
intense but uncontrolled field of magic by casting too many spells at one 
area or item (TCoM, c pp. 228-9). Think also of the mention of the 
dangers of a critical Black Mass being formed from all the books at 
Unseen University Library.
  In game terms, areas with intense but _uncontrolled_ magical fields 
cause disruptions in reality, distorting local causality and causing 
strange and unpredictable things to occur. Areas that took a direct hit 
from a spell during the Mage Wars are examples. This type of effect can 
also be created if a powerful spell (axiom 13 or greater) is miscast, 
using a variant of the rules for Erratic Failure (The Delphi Council 
Worldbook Volume I, pp. 118-20). Such a miscast occurs if any caster 
fails to beat the Difficulty Number of the spell, and the result points 
of the failure get a Superior (7 points) or greater result on the Power 
Push table. Such an eventuality creates an area of the above mentioned 
intense but uncontrolled magical field, equal in size and duration to the 
value of the result points. After that results that are dangerous and/or 
messy and/or weird are left to the GM's imagination.
  The same type of effect may result if two or more spells are cast onto 
the same item or into the same area at the same time. Spells that meet at 
the same time, especially those cast simultaneously in magical combat, 
tend to cancel out with unexpected side effects, for example the duel 
between Carding and Spelter (S, p. 40). Normally this type of timing 
isn't possible under the Torg combat rules; only spells being used in 
combat with cast times greater than 10 (i.e., activating at the end of 
the combat round) could possibly go off simultaneously.
  However, simultaneous spell activation can be simulated by use of the 
Drama Deck. In a combat round where two (or more) spell casters on one 
side (Hero or Villain) get a Setback result, their spells collide. In 
a combat round with multiple spells being cast from _both_ sides, then a 
Setback result for _either_ will cause a collision. (For GMs who want to 
keep an element of surprise for this, a second draw of the Drama Deck for 
the purposes of determining any Setback results for spell casting may be 
necessary.) And of course, a GM may also want to flip cards from the 
Drama Deck to see if spells collide, even when combat is not taking place.
  If two or more spells meet like this, compare the result points. The 
result points will cancel each other out on a one-to-one basis, even for 
odd numbers of spells. (For example, if three spells meet at once, with 
result points of 4, 5, and 8, then the number of result points common to 
all (4) will cancel out, leaving results of 0, 1, and 4.) If one or more 
of the spells still has 7 or more result points, then an area of intense 
but uncontrolled magic results. Once again, the size and duration of the 
area depends on the value of the results; each set of results that is 
still of 7 or more points after cancelling out is added for a total 
'magical fallout' value.

Magic-Users
  There are two main way to get to use magic. One may be born into it, or 
one may learn it like any other skill.
  Magic skills are usually hereditary. The son of a wizard will usually 
be a wizard himself, although it probably should not be put past the 
Discworld to let it skip generation or drop out all together. Similarly, 
the eighth son of an eighth son will also traditionally be a wizard. (The 
eighth son of a eighth son of an eighth son will be a wizard squared - a 
sourcerer. But their sheer level of power is dangerous to the fabric of 
reality because of Magical (In)Stability, and so their are prohibitions 
on wizards marrying or fornicating.)
  Whether these hereditary factors also apply to witches has never been 
spelt out. It's possible that they do, but OTOH, considering that much of 
the Disc is made up of cliches, possibly not. It is unusual, but not 
actually forbidden, for witches to marry (WS, p. 25).
  People may also learn to use magic. Use the standard Torg rules for 
learning new skills (Torg RB, p. 20; Aysle SB, p. 24). As a permutation 
on this, it is also possible for a dying wizard (and possibly witch) to 
invest his or her power in another - such as the case where Drum Billet 
gave his power to Eskarina Smith (ER, p. 10).
  However, magical societies try to discourage too many people from 
learning magic. It's dangerous stuff, both on a personal and social 
level. The problem is that the Things from the Dungeon Dimensions are 
always trying to break into the world, and minds that use magic shine 
brightly against the dull background of the non-magic-using masses. The 
Things try to use magic to both break through into the Discworld, then - 
because they have no morphogenetic field of their own - stabilise 
themselves so that they can last in what for them is the ultimate alien 
reality: reality itself.
  The two best known types of magic-users from the Discworld are the 
wizards and witches. The difference between their magic is partly one of 
differences between how the sexes think: "How the mind works. Men's minds 
work different to ours, see. Their magic's all numbers and angles and 
edges and what the stars are doing, as if that really mattered. It's all 
power. It's all [geometry]" (Granny Weatherwax, ER, p. 60). Wizards lust 
after power (E, p. 21) and tend to use lots of magic to attain it despite the 
limitations on it (TCoM, pp. 52-3). This means they will use any 
advantage available, including a preference for Impressed spells. 
Witches, on the other hand, recognise those limitations; they are 
essentially minimalists when it comes to using magic, and prefer to use 
psychology ("headology") to get what they want by getting other people to 
do it for them. Witches usually find that too much magic just gets in the 
way, and find they don't have to cast spells to do things when they can 
get other people to do it for them. Wizards try to master the world, 
impose their will upon it, and generally try to create things from 
scratch. Witches usually try to influence the world, and work with what 
already exists. Wizards try to change the world, while witches try to 
change the people.
  Other types of magic users have been mentioned, but not greatly detailed:
  Alchemists. Have had quite a bit written about them, but strictly 
speaking they aren't magic-users. There's a demarcation over who can use 
magic that the wizards enforce, and so the Alchemists stick to mixing 
their chemicals. The most noteworthy fact about the alchemists is that 
the blow up their guildhall in Ankh-Morpork every three months or so.
  Demonologists "tended to be surreptitious, pale men who got up to do 
complicated things in darkened rooms and had damp, weak handshakes. It 
wasn't good clean magic. No self-respecting wizard would have any truck 
with the demonic regions, whose inhabitants were as big a collection of 
ding-dongs as you'd find outside a large belfry." "This might seem odd, 
because if there is one thing a wizard would trade his grandmother for, 
it is power. But it wasn't all _that_ strange, because any wizard bright 
enough to survive for five minutes was also bright enough to realise that 
if there was any power in demonology, then it lay with the demons. Using 
it for your own purposes would be like trying to beat mice to death with 
a rattlesnake." (E, p. 21)
  Warlocks have only been mentioned in that, like witches, they are 
traditionally supposed to spend Alls Fallow eve in bed. No practicing one 
has been identified so far, and as the _Companion_ points out, "no one 
even knows how many legs one should have".
  From the wizards point of view other magic-users are bellow them. 
Magicians are usually those who failed to gain entrance to Unseen 
University, and are dismissed as "mere magical technologists". Magicians, 
in turn, look down on conjurers (although the conjurers tend not to 
notice "and really infuriate magicians by not realising how lowly they 
were and kept telling them jokes"). At the bottom, with no training at 
all, are the thaumaturgists, who collect the magical ingredients needed 
for spells. (ER, p. 125)

High Magic, Manipulation, and Conclavity
  In this context High Magic simply means the extremely occult looking 
and magicky casting of spells favoured by the more traditional minded 
wizards. Lots of rare and esoteric materials (octopus toenails, dew 
collected off deadly nightshade, human blood, moonbeams, etc), 
paraphernalia (dribbly candles, rams skulls, ravens trained to say 
'Nevermore', the mandatory pointy hat and wizard's robe inscribed with 
occult sigils), plus maybe helpers to hold the thuribles and wave the 
wands. This stuff is vitally important to maintain the _mystique_ of 
magic. Casting can often be performed without all this, but the result is 
not as spectacular and paying customers feel shortchanged.
  Quite often wizard spells designed on the principles of High Magic will 
have options for manipulation built into that go beyond those that would 
be considered normal, even for Aysle. Thus, they have the option of quick 
and simple castings in private if they need, or factoring in all sorts of 
estoterica for public displays (the Rite of AshKente is the best 
documented example). Witches, who rarely cast magic and primarily use 
only their pointy hats to impress their customers, do not configure their 
spells this way.
  Spells created for High Magic will almost always have included 
manipulation of Cast Time, plus other process theorems depending on the 
purpose of the spell. High Magic has also developed a new process 
theorem, called Conclavity. Conclavity allows a spell to be cast with as 
little as one mage, but with the option adding in many more. If multiple 
casters are factored in, then one wizard will have to be designated the 
leader of the spell's casting, and he or she must roll her total as 
normal. However, if the other casters participating in the spell 
succeed in beating the spell's DN as well, then the value of the number 
of additional casters who succeed is added as a bonus number to the 
total of the leading caster.

Spells
  The spells of the Discworld are sapient and lead private lives of 
their own in the pages of grimoires. Moreover, grimoires have their own 
collective intelligence composed of the sum of the spells they contain. 
Some spells resent being memorised and crammed into someone's head, and 
may vindictively try to return the experience. A person reading a 
grimoire (whether learning the spell, Impressing it into memory, or just 
scanning its contents) runs the risk of being attacked and 'eaten' by the 
contents if the book or scroll is feeling belligerent. If anybody 
investigates the screams, they'll find the victim's shoes with the 
lassic wisp of smoke coming out of them, and the grimoir looking smug 
and noticeably fatter. Then a mage will have to be called in to cast a 
spell that will allow the person Impressed into the grimoir to be 
released and reconstituted.
  Both individual spells and grimoires are capable of doing this. The 
spell or grimoire uses its 'Mind' value against the reader. The value of 
a spell's MIN is the average of its Backlash, Difficulty, and Effect 
values. The MIN value of grimoires is the average of the MIN values of 
the spells it contains, plus the bonus number from the Many-On-One table 
for the appropriate number of spells. For this reason it is tactically 
sound for wizards to include at least one low powered spell in a 
grimoire, especially if the other spells include the likes of Sunder 
Spirit. The reader defends with his or her Mind (or Willpower). If the 
attacking spell or grimoir gets a Minimal to Good success, than the 
target escapes physically unharmed but suffers as per the Interaction 
Results Table. If a Superior or better success results, then the target 
is 'eaten' by being Impressed into the book.
  Grimoires may also use the same method to 'consume' other magical books 
(MP, pp. 168-9).
  The sapience of spells is an effect supported by the LoChaoticWhimsy, 
and can affect spells from other realities as a one case contraction. 
Particular care should obviously be taken to avoid being attacked by 
spells from Tharkold and Orrorsh.

Some spells:
Chant of the Trodden Spiral (TLF) (Druidic, so may be a miracle)
Englebert's Enhancer (HF)
Eringya's Surprising Bouquet (RM)
Fresnel's Wonderful Concentrator (TCoM)
Gindle's Effortless Elevator (MP)
Herpetty's Seismic Reorganiser (RM)
Infernal Combustion Enigma (CoM)
Maligree's Wonderful Garden (S)
Pelepel's Temporal Compressor (S)
Raising of the Cone of Power (LaL)
Spell of Binding (TLF)
Spold's Unstirring Divisor (HF)
Spolt's Forthright Respirator (HF)
Stacklady's Morphic Resonator (LaL)
Sumpjumper's Incendiary Surprise (RM)
Turning To Animals (TCoM)
Vestcake's Floating Curse (TCoM)

Atavarr's Personal Gravitational Upset 
(CoM, pp. 208-211)
Axiom level: 9 (17)
Skill: alteration/inanimate forces 22
Backlash: 19
Difficulty: 16
Effect value: 12 (250 kg)
Bonus number to: duration
Range: 8 (40 meters)
Duration: 20 (2.5 hours)
Cast time: 16 (30 minutes)
Manipulation: cast time, control, range

  This Focused and Impressed spell will affect one folk person of up to 
250 kg (taking into account the weight of some wizards). If a person is 
affected the force of gravity will reorient exactly 90 degrees from its 
standard direction, and allow him to walk on walls. As long as the new 
"down" is exactly 90 degrees to the old one, the caster may determine 
what way gravity will reorient, but once set it cannot be changed. The 
spell may be ended by the caster at will.
  Recipients of this spell who are prepared for its casting can walk from 
the old "down" direction to the new one (i.e., walking, rather than 
falling, onto a wall) by making a DEX total against a base Difficulty of 
12. Recipients who aren't prepared for its casting will take falling 
damage as normal.
  The spell is Impressed into memory though concentration on a square 
block, which is rotated in the caster's hands during memorisation.

Brother Hushmaster's Potent Asp-Spray
(S, p. 40)
Axiom level: 12 (17)
Skill: conjuration/earthly 22
Backlash: 18
Difficulty: 16
Effect value: 12
Bonus number to: effect
Range: 2 (2.5 meters)
Duration: 9 (1 minute)
Cast time: 15 (15 minutes)
Manipulation: cast time, range, speed

  This Impressed spell creates a spay of silver-coloured asps that 
materialise in mid flight towards the target. Naturally, the asps are 
quite angry at such treatment, and will bite the target(s). Once their 
venom has entered someone's bloodstream it causes damage each round 
equal to the total Effect of the spell plus the Many-On-One value of the 
number of asps that bit. At the end of the spell's duration both the 
asps and the venom vanishes.
  The number of asps conjured is equal to the value of the bonus number 
generated, to a minimum of one.
  The spell is Impressed into a small staff, carved into the shape of a 
serpent.

Eightfold Seal Of Stasis
(TLF, pp. 7, 9)
Axiom level: 12 (17)
Skill: alteration/magic 23
Backlash: 20
Difficulty: 16
Effect value: 35
Bonus number to: effect
Range: 4 (6 meters)
Duration: 37 (10 months)
Cast time: 24 (15 hours)
Manipulation: cast time, control, duration, conclavity

  When this ceremonial octogram of up to 6 meters across is drawn out on 
the floor it creates an anti-magical field that is "generally agreed in 
magical circles to have all the stopping power of a well-aimed 
halfbrick". The casting requires a full 15 hours of ceremonies by the 
participant(s), which do not necessarily need to be elaborate.
  A spell being cast within the area of the Seal must make a total 
greater than the Effect total of the Seal to work. If the spell fails it 
is dispelled even as it forms, otherwise the Seal itself is destroyed.
  The Eightfold Seal Of Stasis was inscribed upon the floor of the room 
that the Octavo was originally kept n at Unseen University, hence the 
high Effect, Duration and Cast Time values. Less potent versions are 
available.

Megrim's Accelerator
(S, p. 40)
Axiom level: 10 (17)
Skill: alteration/inanimate forces 16
Backlash: 18
Difficulty: 11
Effect value: 14
Bonus number to: effect
Range: 4 (6 meters)
Duration: 5 (10 seconds)
Cast time: 16 (30 minutes)
Manipulation: cast time, range, speed

  This Impresed spell creates a small area (1 cm diameter) with highly 
accelerated molecular motion, which can be fired in a straight line at 
an opponent. The zone of acceleration causes any matter it comes in 
direct contact with to be shaken apart and disintegrated. It also causes 
the air around itself out to a distance of 10 cm diameter to become 
extremely hot.
  The target of Accelerator may be able to dodge the disintegrating 
effect, but not necessarily the heat effect. If the caster's attack roll 
is equal to, or greater by 4, than the target's defense, then the 
Accelerator has only grazed the victim with the heat effect. If, however, 
the attack roll is greater by 5 or more, then the target has been hit 
squarely by the disintegration effect, and had a nasty hole punched 
through some part of his body and suffering an extra Wound.
  The spell is Impressed into memory though visualisations of material 
objects vibrating to pieces. The casting of this spell requires the 
drawing of sigils in the air, and the uttering of a single syllable to 
unleash it. 

Quondum's Attractive Point
(RM, pp. 243, 254-5)
Axiom level: 9 (17)
Skill: alteration/inanimate forces 21
Backlash: 18
Difficulty: 14
Effect value: 15
Bonus number to: effect
Range: 8 (40 meters)
Duration: 5 (10 seconds)
Cast time: 18 (1 hour)
Manipulation: cast time, control, range

  This Impresed spell creates a point of artificial gravity that attracts 
everything within the spell's area of effect, a sphere 10 meters in 
radius. The Point attracts items to it with a force equal the Effect plus 
their weight value (ignoring the limitation of 'terminal velocity' at an 
aggregate value of 14 under normal falling rules ('climbing', TRB, p. 52)).
  How many times a person or object takes damage depends on what and when 
things collide. Hypothetically, if a person were the only thing being 
attracted by the Point, he would not take damage at all. More likely, 
however, he would collide with something head-on at the Point, taking 
damage. And if there were something behind him, he would take damage 
again as it ran into him. And then when the spell expired, the whole lot 
would take normal falling damage if the effect of the spell has gouged 
out a crater or destroyed the floor. (It's a _fun_ spell :-)
  Taking into consideration that many structures are built to withstand 
gravity from one direction only, use of this spell will have a good 
chance of causing a building to collapse, no matter what its normal 
structural strength.
  The spell is Impressed into memory by a ritual process of wrapping 
successive layers foils of heavy metal (lead, usually) around a ball.

Rite of AshkEnte
(various)
Axiom level: 15 (17)
Skill: conjuration/entity 25
Backlash: 18
Difficulty: 16
Effect value: 25
Bonus number to: effect
Range: 0 (1 meter)
Duration: 15 (15 minutes)
Cast time: 16 (30 minutes)
Manipulation: cast time, control, duration, conclavity

  This ceremony summons Death, so that He may be interrogated for 
information. Since Death knows almost everything (although does not 
necessarily understand it) he is an excellent source of details, although 
senior wizards are understandably reluctant about calling attention to 
themselves in this way. Traditionally it has also been thought to bind 
Death to within the ceremonial octogram that He appears within, but 
experience has demonstrated that He only stays inside out of a sense of 
politeness.
  With the full paraphernalia that makes traditional members of the High 
Magic school of wizardry comfortable, this spell takes hours of work for 
eight wizards at each point of the octogram. However, at least two 
simpler versions are known to exist; both involving a few people, one 
involving three small bits of wood and 4cc of mouse blood, the other with 
two bits of wood and a fresh egg. Once the casting is complete, the 
Effect total is compared to a total based on Death's Spirit of 14. 
Success means He appears in the octogram. While being summoned at 
inconvenient times tends to tick Death off, what really annoys him is 
being addressed as "foul fiend" and other archaic terms usually applied 
to demons.


FOLK RACES
  The main Folk population of the Discworld includes humans, dwarves, and 
trolls. Elves on the Discworld are typically the half human get of the 
wild elves from Fairyland and are small in number. The first three are 
common PC races, with the possibility of Disc eleves and gnomes/goblins 
being usable with GM approval.

Dwarfs
  The dwarfs of the Discworld are essentially identical biologically to 
the dwarves described in the Aysle sourcebook. The only significant 
physical difference is that the former live only 300 years rather than 
the latter's 500. There are also some variances in their cultures, but 
this is due primarily to slightly different emphasis on different things.
  Disc dwarves traditionally have been miners, and have a love of gold 
which they can sing about for hours in songs with lyrics that go "gold, 
gold, gold, gold". Although it is not commonly known, they also have an 
even greater love for iron. They also make excellent engineers and 
mechanics. A dwarf's tools are usually buried with him when he dies, 
since using another dwarf's tools is considered almost an obscenity.
  Dwarves are straightforward people who have no use for metaphor or 
simile; "rock is hard and darkness is dark is their motto. Start mucking 
around with definitions like that and you're in trouble".
  All dwarves have beards and wear up to 12 layers of clothing, often 
including the almost obligatory chain-mail underwear. This makes 
courtship a delicate affair of trying to find out exactly what sex the 
other dwarf is; and is compounded by the habit of more traditional 
dwarfen communities of only using the male pronoun.
  The phrase "B'zugda-Hiara", translating literally as "lawn ornament", 
is a killing insult to a dwarf. They also take great exception to short 
jokes.
  Traditional dwarfish weapons are the double-headed throwing axe, 
although they have also developed bakery to a fine and deadly art with 
their recepies for Dwarf Bread. They find the sound of hammering 
soothing, and dwarfs in clerical positions often employ goblins to strike 
small ceremonial anvils to help them think.
  Rat is considered a delicacy among dwarfs; they have a variety of ways 
of serving them up, but most common with ketchup. Gimlet's Hole Food in 
Ankh-Morpork claims to have the best fried rat in town.

Typical dwarf:
DEX 8,   STR 9,   TOU 9,   PER 8,   MIN 8,   CHA 7,   SPI 7

Elves
  If the dwarfs of the Discworld are near identical to their Ayslish 
namesakes, the elves most certainly are not. Pratchett makes the 
distinction of Tolkeinesque elves (including those of Aysle and most 
other high fantasy settings) deriving from the Tuatha de Danaan, while 
his are more like the Sidhe, "your basic faerie baby-snatchers". Let's be 
blunt about this: the elves that once infested the Discworld (referred to 
euphemistically as the Lords and Ladies, among other things, but perhaps 
best described wild elves to distinguish them from their part-human get) 
are charming and glamorous (in all senses of those words) and beautiful, 
as well as being cruel, vicious, bloodthirsty, self-centred parasites. 
Their part human descendants that still live on the Disc retain attitudes 
that make them little better. Both will be covered here; but note that 
while 'Disc elves' may be usable as SK PCs - providing the effort is made 
to develop a suitable motivation for them to grace the rest of the world 
with their presence - the wild elves are not.
  Wild elves can breed with humans, although this is probably due to some 
bizarre effect of the Discworld's reality rather than any biological 
compatibility. The result is a race of foxy-looking, pointy-eared humans 
who sunburn easily and tend to giggle a lot. They have none of their 
elven ancestors benefits, but still keep themselves arrogantly aloof from 
other races on the Discworld. Unlike wild elves, Disc elves can actually 
have a real Charisma attribute higher than 7.
  The race of wild elves may or may not have originated on the Discworld, 
but was driven away to the fringe reality known as Fairyland centuries or 
perhaps as much as a few millennia ago by the witches. They still turn up 
from time to time to make merry, which usually means making everybody 
else miserable. Elves are arrogant, callous, and bloodthirsty, but have 
style, beauty, and glamour. The thing to remember about elves is that 
they believe themselves to be the pinnacle of creation, and have no 
empathy for any other creature; everyone and everything else is there to 
be used and abused for their convenience and entertainment. They enjoy 
tormenting and killing things slowly, because the fun lasts longer that 
way. They are just as adept at running down solitary humans, dwarfs, and 
trolls as they are at torturing baby rabbits to death over an ants nest. 
They do not even care about one another, and the misfortune and death of 
another elf of their group is simply more entertainment.
  Wild elves are the same size and shape as Ayslish elves, but are fair-
skinned rather than dark-skinned. They benefit from the same type of 
enhancement packages when using the reality of Fairyland (keeping in 
mind that magical enhancement packages are forbidden under Discworld 
reality by the Law of Conservation of Reality). Wild elves are actually 
quite plain to look at (maximum actual Charisma of 7), but they hide 
this by the use of Fairyland's Law of Glamour, or with the glamour 
spells they created when they still lived on the Discworld. As long as 
they are conscious they appear to have the maximum possible Charisma 
for the Fairyland reality: 14. They possess blue-green blood which is 
copper rather than iron based, and are referred to with the pronoun 'it' 
in LaL. The _Companion_ suggests that gender is more or less optional 
for them, and that they feel little sexual attraction for one another 
because they know what the other elves are really like.
  The primary difference with wild elves is that they have a sense that 
allows them to experience electro-magnetic fields, similar to pigeons 
and bees. This sense gives them several advantages, and so must be paid 
for with two attribute limits to 7 (although it is a biological 
benefit rather than one deriving from a world law, and thus does not 
cause a risk of disconnection; it's just that I realise that despite 
all the prohibitions someone will want to play a wild elf - much like 
there are always people who want to play evil characters - and so I 
thought I'd get a few good restrictions in first). This 'elf sight' 
enables an elf to know exactly where it is in relation to a known 
landmark if it is within 5 km if it makes a successful Perception roll 
against a base Difficulty of 8. (Naturally, when in the Living Land 
this ability is rendered dysfunctional by Compass Curse). Elf sight also 
allows an elf to sense the presence of living creatures within 100 
meters by the electrical impulses of their nervous systems (for those 
whose bodies use electrical impulses, of course). Finally, an elf can 
also sense the surface thoughts of a living creature by examining those 
same electrical impulses in the brain. The elf must be within 10 meters 
of the target creature, and make a successful Perception roll against a 
base Difficulty of 15. This will result in a general impression of the 
other's mood and thought processes.
  Because wild elves rely so heavily on their magnetic elf-sight, they 
are especially vulnerable to the presence of iron and other substances 
that deform magnetic fields. The presence of iron is an anathema to 
elves, as it undermines their absolute sense of self placement. Iron 
brought within half a meter of an elf will nullify its elf sight 
completely, and iron weapons that hit an elf always inflict a minimum of 
a "KO" condition (LaL, p. 337).

Typical wild elf:
DEX 10,   STR 7,   TOU 8,   PER 9,   MIN 8,   CHA 7 (14),   SPI 6
Typical Disc elf:
DEX 9,   STR 7,   TOU 7,   PER 9,   MIN 8,    CHA 8,   SPI 7

Gnomes/Goblins
  According to the _Companion_, the terms are interchangable. They are 
the smallest of the Discworld's humanoid species. Use the base attributes 
for the keefee in the _Land Below_ sourcebook (p. 48).

Typical gnome:
DEX 8,   STR 4,   TOU 5,   PER 8,   MIN 9,   CHA 9,   SPI 8

Trolls
  The trolls of the Discworld are different to the trolls elsewhere, and 
are in fact an ancient species of humanoid, silicon-based life forms. 
When encountered in climates that are hospitable to humans most trolls 
are about seven feet high, very strong, and seemingly not particularly 
intelligent. Trolls have brains made of impure silicon, and as a 
result naturally nocturnal creatures because sunlight reduces the 
superconductivity of their brains, putting them into a dormant state. 
Trolls in Ankh-Morpork who need to be active by day are said to use 
sunblock, although what they use to block out environmental heat rather 
than direct sunlight is unclear.
  Conversely, cold increases the superconductivity of their brains, 
increasing their intelligence. The specific temperature for the most 
efficient use of their brains varies between trolls, but it has been 
demonstrated that Detritus has a maximum brain efficiency level lower 
than most others, and is most intelligent when within a fraction of a 
degree of freezing to death (MaA, p. 150). As a general rule, use the 
following generalisations for determining trollish intelligence:
      Average (actual) Intelligence (MIN and PER) at between -30 to 0 
          degrees Centigrade.
     +1 bonus to both MIN and PER for every 5 degree drop below -20 
          degrees, with death occurring at around -60 degrees Centigrade.
     -1 penalty to both MIN and PER for every 5 degree rise above 0 
          degrees, with hibernation setting in at 25 degrees.
  Thus, in their native climate (high, cold mountains), trolls as a race 
possess average intelligence. It's just that those who descend to the 
warmer climates around Ankh-Morpork loose it due to environmental effects.
  Trolls tend to have amazingly long natural lifespans. They keep growing 
in size, and as they get older they settle down to think about 
philosophy. Slowly their bodies solidify up, leaving them in a near 
hibernation state. Many of the Disc's mountain ranges are in fact 
extremely old trolls who are having a quiet ponder.
  However, trolls who will be encountered in human-like lifestyles are 
relatively young, anything up to around 250-300 years old (in MP Ruby 
notes that she's pushing 150, which is not a good age for a trollish 
female to be out in the husband market).
  When trolls are killed their sluggish nervous system usually takes a 
while to register the fact, so that trolls always get one attack in the 
round after they have suffered mortal wounds. Trolls turn instantly to 
stone when they are finally dead (TCoM, p. 81).
  Contrary to popular perception trolls don't really eat people. They 
can't, because they can't digest protein. Trolls eat rock, and drink lava 
(and find sulphuric drinks are intoxicating). Nevertheless, when it comes 
to scaring the living daylights out of opponents, the threat of being 
eaten is a good one. So they shovel others into their mouths and chew 
them up. But they have to spit out the bits later, although it has been 
speculated that if a troll swallowed he might be able to digest the 
calcium and trace elements.
  Female trolls don't have hair, but do make themselves beautiful by 
cultivating lichen.
  Gargoyles are a subspecies of troll that have adapted to living on 
roofs. They feed on birds, as well as by straining gnats and other 
insects out of the water they funnel out of their mouths and ears. They 
tend to have speech impediments because of the fact that their mouths are 
more or less permanently open, and their movements have been described as 
being like bad stop motion animation. Because of the fact that gargoyles 
are very sedentary, they are not recommended as Player Characters.
  As an aside, races of trolls made from substances other than rock 
exist. In their travels the wizard Rincewind and the tourist Twoflower 
met the sea troll Tethis who fell off the edge of his homeworld of Bathys 
and eventually landed on the Discworld (TCoM, pp. 187-194). Possibly 
other worlds with trolls made from fire or air also exist.

Typical troll:
DEX 6,   STR 13,   TOU 12,   PER 8,   MIN 8,   CHA 6,   SPI 6

Golems
  Golemim are, effectively, the magical or miraculous equivalent of 
robots. Made from clay, they are shaped and baked into humanoid form - 
often they started with exactingly human (or even superhuman) physiques, 
but over time they have had to make repairs to themselves and eventually 
they loose any muscular detail. These pottery shapes are then animated by 
a piece of paper called a 'chem', upon which is written a magical or a 
holy word and then placed inside the golem's head to animate it.
  Although these days the churches have forbidden their creation, it has 
been guessed that there are perhaps as many as a few hundred still extant 
in Ankh-Morpork from previous centuries. And of course, if the golemim 
think they can get away with it they are not adverse to creating more 
golemim themselves.
  After the events of _Feet Of Clay_ it likely that the number of self-
owned and free-willed golemim will be increasing rapidly, and presumably 
these will also be given voices as well. This raises the possibility of 
golem PCs. Should the GM allow such at all, keep in mind that golemim are 
still very rare. Also, if the example of the golem Dorlf is any 
indication, they will be highly principled individuals: I suggest playing 
them as one would a Ayslish with at least 5 adds in Honour.

Typical golem:
DEX 8,   STR 11,   TOU 10,   PER 8,   MIN 8,   CHA 4,   SPI 8


GODS
  "There are three thousand known major gods on the Dsc, and research 
theologians discover more every week" (WS, p. 145). They start out as 
Small Gods, barely sapient motes of energy, but if infused with Belief, 
they can grow to become Gods proper. There are two ways that a god can 
handle the accumulation of belief: set oneself up a the major (or only) 
divinity of a region or nation. The other is to take on a particular 
portfolio of responsibility in an empty niche, which has been described 
as low risk and guaranteed return (SG, p. 139).
  A near comprehensive list of gods and 'god-like entities can by found 
in the _Companion_ (p. 72-3). A smattering of the most interesting, 
esoteric, or frequently appearing are:

* Blind Io - Leader of the official (if rambling) pantheon of Discworld 
gods by dint of his constant vigilance. Blind Io has many eyes, which 
have semi-independent lives of their own; where his eye sockets are on 
his face is blank flesh. He is a thunder god, and has hundreds of 
different identities across the Discworld and 70 different hammers (RM, 
p. 78; SG, p. 154).
* Astoria - Astoria is the Goddess of Love, and a "complete bubblehead". 
She has an elaborate hairdo (SG, p. 137).
* Cubal - Epheban god of Fire.
* Fate - This implacable entity is rumoured to be from another universe.
* Fedecks - The Messenger of the Gods, who uses an arrow as his symbol.
* Flatulus - Epheban god of Winds.
* Foorgol - God of Avalanches.
* Gigalith - Trollish god of wisdom.
* Grune - God of Unseasonal Fruit.
* Herne the Hunted - This timid and apprehensive deity from the Ramtops 
is the god of all woodland creatures whose destiny it is to die in a 
crunchy squeak. He is 3 feet high, has small horns, and long rabbit ears. 
He is not physically powerful, but can run very fast (LaL, pp. 67-8).
* Hoki - Hoki, known variously as the Trickster or the Jokester, is a 
nature god native to the Ramtop Mountains. He can take several forms, 
such as a manifestation as an oak tree; or the shape of half man, half 
goat, and all bad practical joker; or his aspect as "a bloody nuisance". 
He plays the flute, badly. (ER, p. 45).
* Hyperopia - Goddess of Shoes.
* Offler the Crocodile God - Originally from Klatch, Offler is very ugly 
and has trouble speaking because of his tusks. He has precise, if 
reptilian, grace and manners. Klatchians believe that demons are the 
offspring of Offler, and that it is therefore good luck to have one enter 
one's house.
* Om - Great God of the desert nation of Omnia on the Circle Sea (SG).
* Patina - Epheban Goddess of Wisdom, and due to a mistake made by the 
original sculptor of her statue is lumbered with a penguin as her 
symbolic animal. Its generally agreed that she should have had an owl, 
but the artist couldn't sculpt an owl properly and ended up creating a 
penguin shaped bird. Then the Law of belief stepped in and she was stuck 
with it (SG, pp. 154, 158-9).
* Petulia - Epheban Goddess of Negotiable Affection, worshipped by ladies 
of the night. Her statues depict her as having great trouble keeping her 
dress up (SG, p. 138-9).
* P'Tang P'Tang - Newt god (SG).
* Queen of the Sea - The Sea Queen is the goddess who gains power from 
the worship given the sea. She is very powerful because lots of people 
believe in the power of the sea, but she is not very intelligent, even by 
godly standards. She has a short attention span, tends creates her own 
sacrifices and when doing so goes for quantity (SG, pp. 120, 238).
* Reg - God of Club Musicians.
* Sandelfon - God of Corridors.
* Seven-handed Sek.
* Steikhegel - God of Isolated Cow Byrnes.
* Topaxci - God of the Red Mushroom.
* Tuvelpit - God of Wine. He is depicted as a tubby fellow in a toga, and 
is called Smimto in Tsort (SG, p. 137).
* Ur-Gilash - Formerly the chief god in the area that is now the nation 
of Omnia, before the god Om displaced him. He has been gone for so many 
millennia that it is not even certain now if he was a weather god, or a 
giant spider god (SG, pp. 127-8).
* Zephyrus - God of Light Breezes.


DISCWORLD CHARACTERS
  Discworld characters are made using the standard rules for character 
creation. Magical enhancement packages are forbidden because of the Law 
of Conservation of Reality. Cosm limits are 13 for all attributes, except 
for Toughness and Strength which may both be as high as 15.


WEAPONS - DWARF BREAD
  The traveling properties of dwarf bread are legendary, as is its 
ability to save the lives of starving travelers. People simply have to 
look at it to have added incentive to find something other than dwarf 
bread to eat (a +1 bonus to the relevant food gathering skills, such as 
Survival).
  "There are many recipes for the flat round loaves of Lancre dwarf 
bread, but the common aim of all of them is to make a field ration that 
is long-lasting, easily packed and can disembowel the enemy if skimmed 
through the air hard enough. Edibility is a kind of optional extra. Most 
recipes are a closely guarded secret, apart from the gravel." (L&L, 
p.306) (although the witch Nanny Ogg has mentioned that she uses used 
cat litter in hers).
  _Feet Of Clay_ reveals quite a bit of incidental detail about dwarf 
bread. This includes the presence of the Dwarf Bread Museum in Whirligig 
Alley in Ankh-Morpork, with a fine collection of offensive bakery. Most 
of the collection consists of bread in the classic cowpat shape, but also 
has such weapons as buns, close-combat crumpets, deadly throwing toast, 
drop scones (deadly at short range), and combat muffins.
  GMs who want to arm PCs with dwarf bread (or other dwarf bread-
products) should probably take the stats for the most similar melee or 
missile weapons, modified slightly if necessary. The items that usually 
come to mind as 'dwarf bread' are discus-like missile weapons with a +5 
plus to their Damage value and a maximum Damage value of 19, with ranges 
of 3-5/25/40. Other loaves might be used as cudgels and have values such 
as +3/18.


SKILLS
Pulp Martial Arts (Dexterity based)
  The Discworld reality set supports the B-Grade movie style martial arts 
introduced in the _High Lords' Guide to the Possibility Wars_ (here 
called Pulp Martial Arts rather than Nile Martial Arts). To use this 
skill the Discworld requires the same flashy moves, strangled cries, and 
mysterious names (such as the Path of the Happy Jade Lotus) as in the 
Nile Empire and on Terra (LaL). The only difference between the two is 
that since the Discworld does not have the Law of Morality, certain 
specific martial arts moves cannot be assigned solely to people of 
either Good or Evil Inclination - they are available to all.
  Pulp Martial Arts may not be used unskilled.

Recognise Reality (Perception based)
  There are certain things in the Discworld that normal people cannot 
see, simply because their existence violates peoples' cultural prejudices 
and so causes their minds to not recognise them, in accordance with the 
Power of Belief. The Night People (the Tooth Fairy girls, Death, et al) 
are one example. The use of this skill indicates that the possessor has 
the capacity to overcome this preconception, and recognise otherwise 
unnoticeable supernatural phenomenon for what they are. This skill is 
taught to all wizards and most (if not all) witches. Undead also gain it 
automatically at one add, since their deceased state makes them something 
of outsiders to normal society, as do the Night People.
  This skill may be used passively or actively, and simply requires the 
comparing of the person's skill value (for passive use) or effect value 
(for active use) against the Difficulty of noticing something. This 
Difficulty may be a base value, or the effect value of the Remain 
Unnoticed ability if one of the Night People is actively trying to remain 
unseen. (Remain Unnoticed is an inherent ability of the Night People, as 
Death's granddaughter discovered. Normal people can't learn it as a skill.)
  Recognise Reality may be used unskilled, but only in extreme cases 
where people are in a heightened state of awareness, needing to roll a 
total of 7 points or more (Superior success). Children, however, have 
a tendency to use it naturally, but naturally no one ever listens to them.
  Careful discussion on the mailing lit has led to the conclusion that 
what constitutes 'so weird that people automatically ignore it' is 
something best left in the control of the gamesmaster. The Discworld 
is generally such as weird place that only the _really_ occult and 
mysterious stuff would count. However, while this means that it is not 
possible for an non-Discworld PC to Remain Unnoticed, it is unfortunately 
an ability that any Horrors from Orrorsh can use.

-----
Saxon Brenton     City library of the Uni of Technology, Sydney, Australia
saxon.brenton@uts.edu.au          |          saxonb@mpx.com.au
The Librarian "liked people who loved and respected books, and the best 
way to do that, in the Librarian's opinion, was to leave them on the 
shelves where Nature intended them to be." - Terry Pratchett, _Men At Arms_



Date: Sun, 12 May 1996 21:57:45 -0500
From: Saxon.Brenton@uts.edu.au (Saxon Brenton)
To: Multiple recipients of list <torg@buddha.intecom.com>
Subject: [TORG:1524] Discworld 4 of 4
X-Listprocessor-Version: 6.0c -- ListProcessor by Anastasios Kotsikonas
X-Comment: The Torg Mailing List

Post 4
FRINGE REALITIES
  In the course of the Discworld series a number of other dimensions have 
been revealed. Some of these are actually other cosms (or non-cosm in the 
case of the Dungeon Dimensions). Most can be considered fringe realities 
adjacent to the Discworld's cosm, and the latter tend to share some of 
the Discworld's world laws, particularly the Law of Chaotic Whimsy. 
Unless otherwise noted, the axiom levels and cosm attribute limits for 
Discworld's fringe realities are the same as for their parent cosm.

DEATH'S DOMAIN
  This pocket dimensional fringe reality was created by Death, and for 
the most part its reality is identical to that of the Discworld's. This 
is because Death doesn't have much imagination, and can only copy what 
He has seen (M, p. 122). The Domain was formerly entirely in black and 
white, but after the events of _Reaper Man_ Death has turned the lands 
surrounding His house into golden fields of wheat - even so this is 
merely a duplication of the landscape he came to know while working for 
Miss Flintworth.
  From the outside this dimension has the flat appearance of a soap 
bubble. From within it looks more solid, but although the mountains in 
the distance will bear weight when stood on, they are fuzzy when seen up 
close. The landscape is illuminated as if at day, but the sky is black 
and strewn with stars. Death keeps a small house (well, it's small on the 
outside, and to most people it seems small on the inside as well, 
although really it isn't) and a garden. There is a bottomless pit within 
the garden, through which the souls of the deceased travel towards their 
next destination.
  Normal time doesn't pass in Death's Domain, only an ersatz time that 
consists of an ever-present now; there is no past, just an older present; 
and no future, just a present that hasn't occurred yet. For this reason 
no one ages in this fringe reality (M, p. 126; RM, pp. 7-8). This effect 
is a function of the area a person is in rather than the person herself. 
Compare this with the Law of Timelessness in Fairyland, which applies 
directly to both the area and the people.
  The differences in reality between the Discworld and this pocket 
dimension are so slight as to make no practical difference. Ords don't 
transform between the two, and the Everlaw of One can't be invoked to 
create a reality storm between Storm Knights possessing these realities.
  Death's Domain can be accessed by magic and astral travel. The mortal 
world can be reached by simply walking, but its almost impossible to 
walk back to this dimension unless one is familiar with the way.
  While we're here we'd also better talk about Death, the character. 
Originally I though I wouldn't have time, but Peter insisted. (Peter is 
one of my fellow staff members at UTS city library, and although he 
isn't subscribed to the mailing list, he reads all my email because he 
finds our antics amusing and bemusing. Everybody wave 'Hi' to Peter.)
  Death is an anthropomorphic personification; one of the oldest about. 
He answers to his master Azrael, the Death of Universes, whom the 
_Companion_ claims to be one of the Old High Ones (DC, p. 173-4). He 
appears as a 7 foot tall skeleton clothed in a robed of darkness. Within 
his eyes are pinpoints of light, usually blue. His voice is felt rather 
than heard, and is sensed in DEEP LEADEN TONES. It is generally agreed 
on alt.fan.pratchett that James Earl Jones should be the voice of Death 
in any hypothetical Discworld movie.
  Death is not, in and of himself, a particularly terrible entity, 
although he is terribly efficient at his job. Any real fear of him 
derives primarily from the fears and preconceptions of those who have or 
are going to meet him.
  In fact, Death is intrigued by humanity, has explored a number of 
aspects of mortal existence, and has developed preferences for things 
like cats and curry. However, his ability to understand almost all raw 
data does not necessarily extend to understanding the nuances of what 
that data means. He is bemused by the efforts of mortals to complicate 
their lives which are, to him, fleeting. He has an empathy with the 
living that results from thousands of years of close contact, and as a 
result he tends to be easily influenced by ideas originating from them, 
like the time he saw a woodcut of himself astride a skeletal steed, 
promptly got himself one, then spent far too much time wiring the bits 
back on.
  He does not get angry, because that requires glands, but he is capable 
of a form of intellectual disapproval that serves the same function; he 
has, for instance, no time for cat haters, and gets irritated when Fate 
and Destiny et al don't bother to tell him when someone is going to 
become a ghost. He also tends to get depressed when he feels 
unappreciated for his efforts.
  Death can be seen by cats, practitioners of magic, and those who are 
in or approaching the state of death. Sometimes others in a heightened 
state of awareness can see him, supporting the notion that the Recognise 
Reality skill can be used unskilled in extreme cases.
  While it is true that Death _can_ be there to handle the demise of 
everyone, he does not always do so. Practitioners of magic can expect to 
be dealt with personally by him, but apart from that only certain people 
important to the overall metaphysical tapestry of death have to be 
collected. As long as these important people are dealt with and die, the 
rest of the dying by everyone and everything else more or less continues 
automatically.

DEX 14
  Beast riding 20; Dodge 19; Manoeuver 20; Melee weapons 26
STR 12
  Lifting 13
TOU 12
PER 10
  Find 15, Tracking 11, Scholar (Disc realm lore) 20; Trick 16
MIN 14
  Test of Will 20; Willpower 20
CHA 9
  Charm 10; Persuasion 14; Taunt 14
SPI 14
  Intimidation 20; Reality 18
Possibilities: As many as he needs.
Equipment: When carrying of his Duty Death always carries his fold up 
scythe, a blade so thin and sharp that it is transparent and blue, and 
capable of slicing apart air molecules, or sound. Its sharpness is 
required to separate the soul from the body. He also possesses a sword 
with the same type of blade, which is used for royalty. He will also be 
carrying the Lifetimers of those mortals whose demises he is present to 
supervise.
  Death's highly intelligent steed Binky is a white, flesh-and-blood 
horse, but who nevertheless has absorbed some of the Ultimate Reality of 
his master. For this reason he can fly, pass through a type of 
hyperspace, and pass through walls, and Remain Unnoticed. Binky wears a 
silver and black harness, with an ornate silver saddle.
Abilities: Death, as the embodiment of a universal concept, is more real 
than most things in the material world. After all, death (and Death) have 
been around pretty much from the Beginning whereas plain old objects like 
doors or walls just don't last for anything like the same length of time. 
Consequently, when comparing time scales most things have an only tenuous 
existence, and so Death (and anyone else holding the office of Death) can 
pass through them. The fact that they may be quite solid in the immediate 
term is irrelevant. This ability means that any material attacks on Death 
(providing that people can actually manage to see him in the first place) 
will simply be ignored.
  Death has the ability to accomplish almost any physical task he sets 
his mind to, due to the power derived from the LoBelief. On occasions 
when he has retired or been removed from his office he has sometimes 
found it embarrassing to be deprived of this.


DUNGEON DIMENSIONS
  Strictly speaking the Dungeon Dimensions aren't realities or cosms at 
all. They are vast, unformed extra-dimensional spaces that cosms exist 
within. They are the home to the Things - malign, envious, but ultimately 
stupid entities that want to gain access to the world. This is because 
life, in one form or another, is capable of evolving anywhere, even in 
places that don't really exist. This is probably possible because 
occasionally small holes are created in a dimension and reality leaks out 
(some wizards have calculated that perhaps as much as nine tenths of all 
the original reality in the multiverse has been lost in this manner - a 
very disturbing idea in the context of Torg).
  Hence, the Dungeon Dimension, which should be a absolutely empty 
wasteland, has some few possibilities, and is just barely capable of 
supporting existence. [Actually, I suspect that the Dungeon Dimensions 
cannot exist around other cosms, such as Core Earth, since even leakages 
of reality alone could not support the existence of tenuous pseudo-
realities in this way. Rather, it must be leakages of reality that 
contain the Law of Chaotic Whimsy that make it possible at all.]
  The desire of the Things to enter reality to take on shape and form has 
been compared to the sea trying to warm itself on a candle, with much 
the same result if they ever actually come in contact.

Axioms and World Laws
N/A
  As a non-cosm the Dungeon Dimensions do not really have a reality at 
all. It's for this reason that when the Things break through into this 
world that they are so desperate to gain a powerful source of magic - 
they have neither a morphogenic field nor natural reality to protect them 
from the effects of the reality they are in, and need the magic to hold 
them together under the principles of Magical (In)Stability (MP, p. 298). 
In this sense even ords are better off than the Things when in an alien 
reality, since ords can transform at least once when in an alien reality; 
Things are simply torn apart by the Everlaw of One. Of course, if lots of 
Things came through all at once, then their cumulative lack of reality 
would tear the world apart. 
  By the same token, ords who have the misfortune to end up in the Dungeon 
Dimensions are destroyed as the Everlaw of One tries to transform them to 
a non-existent reality. Storm Knights can't possess this absence of 
reality; they would be destroyed in the process of converting to it just 
as ords are, but then the Things don't have enough possibilities to 
become possibility-rated to storm them, so the point is moot.
  [Aside: This, if nothing else, should be taken as solid, if not 
incontrovertible, evidence that Rincewind is P-Rated. An ord trapped in 
the Dungeon Dimensions for the length of time he was there between the 
end of _Sourcery_ and the start of _Eric_ would probably have been 
destroyed by transformation. Clearly he would have a tag skill of 
Running, and has been spending possibilities to increase his totals that 
have kept him miraculously alive over the years. Also, the Lady holds 
him as one of her most valuable heroes. Now who, in the Torg game, are 
the heroes? Hmmm? :-) ]
  The way for the Things to invade the word is usually through a lot of 
magic wearing a hole in reality. The Things therefore pay close attention 
to practitioners of magic, invade their dreams to turn them to 
nightmares, and generally try to trick them into using lots of magic (ER, 
p. 111). There is at least one other way for them to get in, which is 
through the Law of Belief; large numbers of people watching movies in the 
Cthinema of Holy Wood and believing what they see on the screen has 
allowed the Things to gain entrance to the world on at least two occasions 
(MP). Apparently Bel-Shamharoth has also been able to gain at least some 
purchase of the Discworld by being worshipped as the Ichor God (CoM, pp. 
88-9; P, p. 14), something that the Insider alsoseems to have been able 
to pull off (DC, p. 126).
  The Dungeon Dimensions can be reached by so weakening reality that a 
hole is created. Apparently the more powerful demons can arrange access 
to and from the Dungeon Dimensions (E, pp. 15, 118), so presumably 
greater gods could too. It is extremely difficult to get from the Dungeon 
Dimensions into any reality because of the energy differentials involved 
(S, p. 251), another indication that the Dungeon Dimensions have little 
or no possibility energy.


DUNMANIFESTIN
  This fringe reality is the home of the official pantheon of gods of the 
Discworld; those who have managed to claw their way up the ladder of cult 
size from being small gods, to large gods worshipped by millions or more 
(Om, with 2 million, didn't make the grade - SG, p. 254). Its entrance to 
the Discworld proper is at the summit of Cori Celesti, the ten mile high 
spire of rock and green ice that stands at the Hub of the Discworld, the 
top of which is also called Dunmanifestin.
  It is important to note that, because of the way that gods develop from 
small gods, Dunmanifestin is not the Spirit 33 Source Cosm of the 
Discworld's faiths. In fact, because of the Law of Resonaces, this cosm 
isn't connected to one single Source Cosm.

Axioms and World Laws
Magic 4     Social 7     Spiritual 22     Technological 11 [?]

Magic 4
  Gods don't need magic since they have their own divine power to do what 
they want. At this level even the normal levels of Divination magic 
become haphazard, and as a result gods cannot always foresee future 
disasters (most importantly a loss of believers that could lead to the 
gods demotion).

Social 7
  Social development and conventions aren't particularly important to 
gods. After all, they exist because their believer imagine them to be 
manifestations of powerful natural forces, and as a result their first 
reaction in any situation is "smite it" (SG, pp. 237-8). The god are part 
of a pantheon led by the most powerful (in this case Blind Io by dint of 
his constant vigilance and his powers as a thunder god) and organised on 
primitive feudal lines. Only those gods with many worshippers can take up 
residence at Dumanifestin; the rest are acknowledged to exist by the 
official pantheon, but generally ignored.
  One of the few rules of Dumanifestin that fighting between gods takes 
place indirectly, though their worshippers, presumably to avoid displays 
of power that would wreak their collective home. Since Om was able to 
relatively easily provoke a fight, this can be surmised to be a rule of 
protocol rather than an enforced world law.

Spirit 22
  Gods are powerful, but not so powerful that their mythos are irrevocably 
set in stone, nor so powerful that new gods cannot arise to either squeeze 
into new niches or take over old ones.

Tech 11 [?]
  Moreso than any other of Dunmanifestin's axioms, this one is a rough 
guess. Of the top of my head I can't think of any evidence to tie down 
this axiom one way or another. Any ideas?

Law of Divine Self-Absorption
  In addition to a few of the 'natural' world laws of the Discworld 
(LoChaotic Whimsy, LoResonaces, LoBelief, but definitely not the 
LoConservation of Reality, Dunmanifestin has this unique world law.
  This world law prevents sapients from paying that much attention to the 
outside world(s) (including the mortal one, which is pretty silly 
considering where the gods' power comes from). No matter what crisis is 
occurring, or how serious the matter affecting the mortals is, it will 
always seem unimportant compared to events (trivial or no) occurring in 
the realm of the gods:
  "although it takes years of effort and work and scheming for a god to 
get there [Dunmanifestin], once there they never seem to do a lot apart 
from drink too much and indulge in a little mild corruption...
  "They play games. They tend to be very simple games, because gods are 
easily bored by complicated things. It is strange that, while small gods 
can have one aim in mind for millions of years, _are_ one aim in fact, 
large gods seem to have the attention span of the common mosquito." (SG, 
pp. 368-9.)
  "Om rubbed his head. This wasn't god-like thinking. It seemed simpler 
when you were up here. It was all a game. You forgot that it wasn't a 
game down there. People died. Bits got chopped off." (SG, p. 368.)
  The Law of Divine Self-Absorption is a passive world law.

  Dunmanifestin is accessible through the entrance at the summit of Cori 
Celesti, and probably also by magic.


FAIRYLAND
  [Details found in _Lords and Ladies_] Also known as Elfland, but more 
often by the prudent euphemism "over there". Again, strictly speaking 
this is not a fringe reality of the Discworld's, but rather an independent 
cosm that occasionally attaches itself to the Discworld (and possibly 
other cosms as well). It is a parasite cosm. It is also the home to the 
race of wild elves who were driven off the Discworld by the witches some 
time ago, and who are the progenitors of the 'elves' (actually, half-
elves) who still inhabit the Disc.
  These elves are known euphemistically as the Lords and Ladies, the 
Shining Ones, the Star People, the Fair Folk, and the Gentry (LaL, p 51). 
They elves apparently periodically try to reinvade the Discworld, but to 
date have been driven back. Some few of them may have taken up residence 
on the Discworld for one reason or another (possibly having been left 
behind from an invasion), but those that transform to or are born on the 
Disc may not use magical enhancement packages. Elves with Discworld 
reality are still reclusive and arrogant, but without the effects of the 
Fairyland's world law, and without the benefits of that world law and the 
use of enhancement packages, they are not so bend on conquest.
  Fairyland is perpetually bound in ice, with no hope of ever seeing 
Spring (LaL, p. 11). Its sky is filled with a rainbow-coloured aurora of 
sparkling lights. Time does not proceed here as it does on other worlds, 
so that while time passes, nobody really ages. This difference makes 
judging the passage of time difficult, and years may seem like only hours. 
The cosm attribute limits are 13, save for DEX, STR and CHA which are 14.
  Although the Fairyland has invaded the Discworld at least once, the 
method used does not seem to be the of the Torg type with Darkness Device. 
The overlay of the Fairyland onto Lancre was strongly reminiscent of a 
mixed zone (the description of how Magrat saw Fairyland merging with 
Lance in LaL p. 331 highlights this), but the means the Queen used seemed 
to be primarily magical/symbolic: having tricked the people of Lancre 
into believing they wanted the elves to return to the Discworld (an 
effect of the Law of Belief) she then intended to marry Verence, the King 
of Lancre. And since the King and the Land are One, then she would have 
absolute control over the mortal world as well.
  If, OTOH, a GM wanted to take the option of using the Wild Elves as 
Possibility Raiders, it can be hypothesised that they'd be quite good at 
it. While the elves themselves have a severe weakness to iron, their 
reality is very seductive. The Law of Glamour projects an aura of power 
and invincibility, while making their opponent feel helpless and unworthy. 
Even if the wild elves initially only created mixed zones, the Law of 
Glamour would make people feel that they should submit themselves to 
Elven rule, thus causing people to transform and eventually turning the 
mixed zones into dominant and eventually pure zones. This is an advantage 
on they way mixed zones normally work that would make most High Lords 
green with envy.

Axioms and World Laws
Magic 13     Social 7     Spirit 3     Tech 7

Magic 13
  Quite potent, but not so potent that the elves can cross between 
dimensions of their own violation. The Queen of the Elves was, however, 
able to end her mind across to scout so as to determine if Lancre was a 
suitable invasion target. The axiom is high enough to support the magical 
enhancement packages of the wild elves. It is high enough to support the 
alteration of living beings into something else (say, the head of an ass) 
(Mag 12), as well as to make it permanent if desired, but reversing the 
process is dangerous. Elves can fly by levitating yarrow stalks.
  Elves have a preference for using Illusion spells, in both the Torgian 
and non-Torgian sense. Torgian illusion spells create physical effects, 
but are short cuts that are easier to cast, and this fits with elven 
attitudes to having to do work. The non-Torg definition covers purely 
mind-affecting or hallucinatory effects, and elves like these as well. 
Given the option, they will use hallucinatory effects first, then short 
cut physical effects, and only rarely 'real' effects.

Social 7
  Elves have only the most basic of feudal politics; they have a king and 
a queen but beyond that and a few retainers few of them seem to be 
capable of individual identity (DC, p. 90). This may help to explain why 
they lack empathy both for other intelligent beings and even to 
misfortunes that befall other elves. They are capable of grasping the 
idea of the ownership of land and of other intelligent beings.

Spirit 3
  Spiritually retarded, the Elves are emotionally ill-disposed to the 
idea that there could be anything, anywhere, that could be more beautiful 
or perfect than they. They are almost incapable of grasping the idea of 
higher powers.

Tech 7
  Bronze is the preferred metal of elves because of their antipathy for 
iron. The elves rode horses and the Queen was said to live in a castle; 
but although the axiom level would support these, I have a mental image 
(but no solid proof) that the elves would not be using the axiom to its 
full advantage.

Law of Glamour
  This law enhances the natural abilities of the wild elves to Charm 
people.
  All elves subject to this world law (not just wild elves, but Disc and 
Ayslish as well - albeit as a contradiction) may use this law to 
consciously project "glamour". This gives them a beautiful appearance, 
with an apparent Charisma attribute equal to their cosm's limit maximum 
for the Charisma attribute of 14. It also gives an apparent attribute 
level of 13 for the use of Interacton skills (ie, 13 for MIN, PER, and 
SPI for the purposes of Test of Will, Willpower, Trick, Taunt, and 
Intimidation). Projecting glamour, which is a conscious activity, does 
not take up much concentration, and so counts as a passive activity.
  Note that this world law functions to enhance _elven_ beauty, style, 
and power - so that any other race that transforms to, or is in an area 
of, this reality does not benefit from these bonuses. Just the opposite 
in fact; non-elves directly subject to this world law feel unworthy in 
comparison to the beauty of the elves, and have a -1 penalty to all 
totals rolled to resist elven glamour (i.e., those rolls that elves use 
when enhanced by this world law).
  The Law of Glamour also supports magical enhancement packages. Elves 
(of whatever type) that are born in or physically transform to this 
reality may purchase 1 or 2 enhancement packages of 3 points each to be 
applied whole to any attribute. These function the same as enhancement 
packages in Aysle, including for payment (either a permanent limit of 7 
on another attribute or an ongoing adventure cost of 1 Possibility per 
package per adventure), and the risk of the Silent Death from magic 
deprivation. (_Aysle_ sourcebook, pp. 133-134)
  The Law of Glamour is an active world law.

Law of Timelessness
  This world law creates the effect that although time passes in 
Fairyland, no one is affected by time. People do not grow old. This has a 
terrible flip side, however. People who do not grow old do not grow up. 
Elves may grow in power and beauty, but never in experience or wisdom. 
Gaining or upgrading all skills is an effort, costing five times as much, 
in either time or Possibilities, as normal.
  The Law of Timelessness is an active world law.

  Fairyland is apparently only accessible through certain stone circles 
or underground mounds, and then only at certain times (Midsummer - crop 
circle season). It is possible that at those times of year Fairyland is 
close enough that they would count as being a fringe reality of the 
Discworld's cosm, and could be accessed by spells like Extradimensional 
Gate at spots other than marked gates. It may be possible that Fairyland 
has similar access to other cosms.


HELL
  [Most details found in _Eric_] Hell, also known as Hades, is the fringe 
reality that is a home to demons. At the center of the Eight Circles is 
the infernal city of Pandemonium. It is important to remember that under 
the Law of Belief people go to the afterlife they are expecting. This is 
why it is important to kill any missionaries who come around preaching of 
eternal torment.

Axioms and World Laws
Magic 16     Social 11     Spirit 9     Tech 14 [?]

Magic 16
  Since Hell is part of the Discworld cosm, and shares the Law of 
Resonaces, it follows that it is subject to the cliche that although 
demons are Fallen angels, they use infernal magics rather than divine 
miracles. Think of the angel Azaphrael's protest to the demon Crowley in 
_Good Omens_: "Angels aren't occult, we're ephereal!"
  So, the demons of Hell use magic. The more senior demons are the most 
powerful, and use the most magic.

Social 11
  Essentially feudal.

Spirit 9
  Well, I'd like to put it at Spirit 17, because this axiom upsets people, 
which is what Hell is supposed to do :-) But if the demons primarily use 
infernal magicks, and the Discworld itself has not stable central mythos 
for them to be renegades from, then it's level of spiritual power is a 
bit limited.

Tech 14 [?]
  Another guess. In _Eric_ Astfgl has introduced a mind-numbingly tedious 
bureaucracy to Hell, but since it was likely that a lot of the more 
advanced items, like the intercoms, were actually magically powered 
copies of things he's seen elsewhere, the exact level remains unclear.

Law of Tradition
  In addition to a few of the 'natural' world laws of the Discworld 
(LoChaotic Whimsy, LoResonaces, LoBelief, but definitely not the 
LoConservation of Reality, Hell has this unique world law.
  Demons are traditionalists, and like to do things in the traditional 
manner. They are by tradition evil, so these demons will never repent. 
The dimension is decorated in traditional red flames, and kept at boiling 
point. They like to put people through the traditional punishments for 
their alleged sins in all sorts of nasty ways, like with boiling oil, red 
hot pokers, dismemberment, having their livers daily pecked out by 
eagles, etc. However, these punishments do not inflict pain, since those 
mortals in Hell are all dead and so do not have physical bodies to feel 
the pain. The demons don't realise this "because numb and mindless 
stupidity is part of what being a demon is all about." (E, pp. 105-6). 
After all, it's traditional.
  Because of this world law demons aren't innovative thinkers and 
usually need to copy humans when it comes to really blood curdlingly 
nasty ways to make people suffer. These methods can't be too creative, 
however, otherwise the demons won't be able to use them; for instance, 
during the reign of King Astfgl they were bewildered by his lordship's 
attempts to set up a filing system, and kept filing everything under "p" 
for people. 
  For that matter, the damned aren't particularly innovative either, 
which is partly why they don't try to escape (the other part being that 
under the Law of Belief people get the afterlife they think they deserve, 
so that those who are in Hell subconsciously don't think they should 
leave).
  The Law of Tradition is an active world law.

  Hell is accessed by dying, magic, or certain caves that lead to and 
from there.


HOLY WOOD
  [Detailed in _Moving Pictures_] Holy Wood is another parasitic reality 
that has periodically invaded Discworld and other cosms as well. However, 
Holy Wood has no Darkness Device or High Lord to direct such an invasion; 
indeed, it doesn't even have a population that it can use to invade with. 
Holy Wood has a different method of taking over other realities. If the 
High Lords can be compared to predators that attack and devour a cosm 
with sheer weight of numbers and then move on, then Holy Wood is best 
described as a virus which only has to infect another reality with one 
tiny piece of itself. Holy Wood's invasion force consists of a "wild idea" 
that insinuates itself into the minds of people so that they change the 
nature of their reality with their own belief. Thus, Holy Wood causes the 
invaded reality to remake itself from within, rather than have change 
forced on it from without.
  The wild idea starts by sneaking into a cosm and inspiring certain 
individuals to set up an entertainment industry based on movies. As people 
watch this entertainment they are infected by the spirit of Holy Wood and 
then contribute, in some way, to the film industry. It may be by working 
for it, or just by supporting it by going to see the movies it puts on. 
Whatever the case, slowly more and more of the society becomes obsessed 
with the Holy Wood phenomenon, and as they focus increasingly on it, the 
Holy Wood reality becomes dominant over the original, and eventually 
supplants it.
  The wild idea that is the core of Holy Wood is reputed to have 
originated from the wastelands outside the universes. It may therefore be 
possible that it was originally one of the Things (from the Dungeon 
Dimensions) that managed to build itself a form that would survive inside 
a real world.

Axioms and World Laws
  Holy Wood has no specific axioms of its own, as it uses whatever the 
local axioms are. It does, however, usually require minimum axioms levels 
of Social 12 (societies trade cultural ideas) and Technological 20 
(movies), in order to organise the entertainment industry, and if 
necessary it is capable of bumping these two axioms up one or two points. 
(In the Discworld was able to use the lower Tech axiom because movies 
weren't dependent on photosensitive film stock.) Other than that Holy 
Wood doesn't change the axiom levels - it just changes how existing 
axioms are applied.

Law of Mass Appeal
  This world law causes people to become infatuated with the ideas and 
mores associated with the Holy Wood reality. A person who encounters Holy 
Wood in this way must roll using their Willpower (or Mind) value against 
a base Difficulty number of 13 or become interested in Holy Wood and 
concentrate on it. The severity of this infatuation will depend on the 
result. If a person fails the roll, then read the result points on the 
Power Push table:
MINIMAL: The person is mildly interested in the entertainment of Holy 
Wood, and will occasionally indulge in it, but at other times will not 
think about it.
GOOD to SUPERIOR: The person enjoys Holy Wood entertainment, will use it 
regularly, and thinks about it in free time when away from it.
SPECTACULAR: The person is obsessed with Holy Wood, watches it almost 
constantly, and thinks about it almost constantly at any other time.
  If left unchecked, this process will eventually spread through the 
population and alter the reality in an astonishing period of time. The 
effect will start with people just concentrate on Holy Wood so that local 
reality becomes dominant over a suppressed Holy Wood Reality. Eventually 
it will create a mixed zone, and the Holy Wood world laws will become 
active. From then the process will snowball into creating a Holy Wood 
dominant zone, at which point the population will begin transforming to 
Holy Wood reality. After that a complete transformation to a Holy Wood 
pure zone is only a matter of time.
  This world law also speeds up the rate at which people transform to 
Holy Wood reality when in an area of the same. Speed up the rate used on 
the Transformation table (Torg Rulebook, p. 86) by one step. This is 
cumulative with the effects of Core Earth's Law of Hope.
  The Law of Mass Appeal is an active world law.

Law of Action
  This world law operates as per the Nile Empire, Terra and the Land 
Below. Two Possibilities may be spent for two roll agains, and one of 
the results chosen.
  The Law of Action is an active world law.


L-SPACE
  (GG, pp. 166-7, 170-1, 201-2) L-Space is short for "Library Space", and 
is created by any large collection of books (not just magical books) 
distorting the fabric of space/time to create a polyfractal extra-
dimensional space to which all other such libraries (both in space and 
time) are connected. The relevant equation for this effect is Knowledge = 
Power = Energy = Mass = Matter; extensive libraries are genteel black 
holes that know how to read (GG, p. 8).
  Traveling through L-Space is dangerous, and moreover the careless use 
of L-Space to affect changes in history can wreck great damage to space/
time, so the secret of this dimension is held inviolate by the Librarians 
of Space and Time. Their three rules are: 1) Quiet, 2) All books are to 
be returned by the last shown date, and 3) Do not interfere with the 
nature of casualty.
  In the novels L-Space is described as connecting not just to libraries 
on the Discworld, but in other universes as well. In Torg terms, the 
process that created L-Space results from the Law of Chaotic Whimsy, and 
thus only connects to those realities that possess this world law: the 
Discworld, the appropriate fringe realities of the Discworld, and other 
cosms with the Law of Chaotic Whimsy. (And not just the fantasy chaotic 
whimsy cosms either. For example, a science fiction chaotic whimsy cosm 
based on Douglas Adam's _Hitchhikers Guide to the Galaxy_ could count as 
well.)
  The cosm attribute limits are 13.

Axioms and World Laws
  The nature of L-Space is shaped by the fact that it is shared by many 
different cosms, and this means that its reality is very different to 
the Discworld's. In addition to the Law of Chaotic Whimsy, there is one 
other world law for this place, which also defines the axioms:

Law of Consensus Reality
  Similar to the Akashan Law of Acceptance (Space Gods, pp. 50-51), this 
world law decrees that all world laws function in L-Space without 
contradiction as long as they do not oppose the existing world laws of 
L-Space.
  The Law of Consensus Reality also decrees that the axiom levels of 
this reality are equivalent to the highest axioms available from those 
cosms that L-Space connects to. It is therefore unlikely that an ord from 
the Discworld would ever disconnect as anything more than a 1 case 
contradiction when in L-Space, even if exceeding her own axioms, because 
it is more than likely that somewhere in the Cosmverse there is another 
chaotic whimsy reality contributing a higher axiom level.
  Finally, the Law of Consensus reality allows librarians from many 
different cosms to use this place without fear of transformation by 
making the entire reality a mixed zone.
  The Law of Consensus Reality is a passive world law.

  L-Space is accessed through any large book collection, but the method 
of doing so is complicated and kept secret by the Lirarians of Space and 
Time. You have been warned. Ook.


MALIGREE'S WONDERFUL GARDENS
  Maligree's Wonderful Garden is the name of a spell developed by 
Maligree, who was the last of the true sourcerers before the arrival of 
the boy Coin in recent years. True sourcerers are immensely powerful 
magicians capable of taking on the gods, whose very presence causes new 
magical power to enter the world, boosting the local Magic axiom above 
the that the Law of Conservation of Reality can cope with, and freeing 
all other magicians in the area of that world law's constraints.
  Unfortunately, Discworld's magicians cannot be trusted to use this sort 
of power responsibly. Under normal circumstances magic is so limited that 
wizards and witches grudgingly tolerate each other to present a united 
front. But given the opportunity to use magic to gain real power, all-out 
thaumaturgic war results (S, pp. 168-9). Then the fallout from the magic 
involved creates those areas of intense magical instability under Magical 
(In)Stability principles, and the world is slowly torn apart as a result.
  Fortunately sourcerers are very rare. Also fortunately, whenever a 
sourcerer does appear they usually figure out what their presence is 
doing to the world and elect to go into exile rather than destroy the 
place. Maligree originally crafted this spell to create a place where he 
could have a quiet smoke, get away from the pressures of the world and 
the burdens of his power, something his fellow wizards couldn't 
understand. Then one day Maligree locked the garden from the inside and 
stayed there (S, p. 34).
  There have been two castings of this spell, the first by Maligree, the 
other by Coin, but it is possible that earlier sourcerers may have used 
similar spells to create similar pocket dimensions. It seems likely that 
each sourcerer created his own Garden, rather than using the spell to 
create a gate to a single world.

Axioms and World Laws
  The fact that these fringe realities are inhabited by magicians powerful 
enough to create them at a whim makes their natures hard to guess at. All 
that is known is that each such cosm is initially in the form of a 
verdant garden with forests, mountains, lakes, and wildlife, and that 
whatever else is done with them each will probably retain a extremely 
high Magic axiom.

  These realities are accessed by magic, but are likely locked from 
within to prevent intrusion.


WHERE THE DRAGONS WENT
  [GG] This fringe reality is one of the dimensions of imagination. This 
is the place (or possibly one of the places) where Draco Noblis, the noble 
Disc dragon (as opposed to Draco Vulgaris, the common swamp dragon) 
departed to after the wild magic left the Disc. This was because the 
noble dragons where thaumivores (i.e., they fed on magic - lots of magic) 
and after the Law of Conservation of Reality limited the working Magic 
axiom to 9 they felt themselves to be too limited to stay.
  In general terms, the dimensions of imagination are reputed to be more 
complex than those of mere space and time (CoM, p166). The physical 
nature of this particular reality is that it is packed solid, like an 
Escher picture where the shape between each dragon is another dragon (GG, 
p. 7) The dragons are dormant in this dimension, but can occasionally be 
summoned back to the Discworld by a skilled imagination who is either in 
an intense magical field, or who has a lot of magical items to "burn" as 
power.
  Since the dragons now possess non-Disc reality which does not contain 
the Law of Conservation of Reality, if summoned back to the Disc they 
can do whatever they want with the Magic axiom as long as they don't 
disconnect.

Axioms and World Laws
[I was working on these, but ultimately it got beyond me in the time I 
allocated to get the second draft done. High Magic, low everything else, 
Law of Fantasy to let the dragons do anything they sodding well want]


DISCWORLD BIBLIOGRAPHY
Code     Book                       	Copyright date

Fiction:
  Novels:
TCoM     The Colour of Magic    	c 1983
TLF      The Light Fantastic    	c 1986
ER       Equal Rites            	c 1987
Mort     Mort                       	c 1987
S        Sourcery                    	c 1988
WS       Wyrd Sisters           	c 1988
P        Pyramids                   	c 1989
GG       Guards! Guards!        	c 1989
E        Eric. London               	c 1990
MP       Moving Pictures        	c 1990
RM       Reaper Man             	c 1991
WA       Witches Abroad         	c 1991
SG       Small Gods             	c 1992
LaL      Lords and Ladies       	c 1992
MaA      Men at Arms            	c 1993
SM       Soul Music             	c 1994
IT       Interesting Times      	c 1994
Mask     Maskerade              	c 1995
FoC      Feet of Clay           	c 1996
HF       Hogfather                	c 1996

  Short Stories:
ToC      Theatre of Cruelty  
TB       Troll Bridge  

Non-Fiction:
SoAM     Streets of Ankh-Morpork 	c 1993
DC       Discworld Companion    	c 1994
DM       Discworld Map          	c 1995

-----
Saxon Brenton     City library of the Uni of Technology, Sydney, Australia
saxon.brenton@uts.edu.au          |          saxonb@mpx.com.au
The Librarian "liked people who loved and respected books, and the best 
way to do that, in the Librarian's opinion, was to leave them on the 
shelves where Nature intended them to be." - Terry Pratchett, _Men At Arms_
